[1501]
Ibn 'Umar reported: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) praying (Nafl prayer) on a donkey's back while his face was turned towards Khaibar.
[1502]
Sa'id b. Yasar reported: I was travelling along with Ibn 'Umar on the way to Mecca. Sa'id said: When I apprehended dawn, I dismounted (the ride) and observed Witr prayer and then again joined him. Ibn 'Umar said to me: Where were you? I said: I apprehended the appearance of dawn, so I dismounted and observed Witr prayer. Upon this 'Abdullah said: Is there not a model pattern for you in the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)? I said: Yes, by Allah, and (then) he said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe Witr prayer on the camel's back.
[1503]
'Abdullah b. Dinar reported on the authority of Ibn 'Umar that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe prayer on his ride (no matter) in which direction it had its face turned. 'Abdullah b. Dinar said that Ibn 'Umar used to do like that.
[1504]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe Witr prayer on his ride.
[1505]
Salim b. 'Abdullah reported on the authority of his father that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be. upon him) used to observe Nafl (supererogatory) prayer on his ride no matter in what direction it turned its face, and he observed Witr too on it, but did not observe obligatory prayer on it.
[1506]
'Abdullah b. 'Amir b. Rabi'a has reported on the authority of his father that he had seen the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observing Nafl player at night on a journey on the back of his ride in whichever direction it turned its face.
[1507]
Anas b. Sirin reported: We met Anas b. Malik as he came to Syria at a place known as 'Ain-al-Tamar and saw him observing prayer on the back of his donkey with his face turned in that direction. (Hammam one of the narrators) pointed towards the left of Qibla, so I said to him: I find you observing prayer towards the side other than that of Qibla. Upon this he said: Had I not seen the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) doing like this, I would not have done so at all.
[1508]
Ibn 'Umar reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was in a state of hurry on a journey, he combined the sunset and 'Isha' prayers.
[1509]
Nafi' reported that when Ibn 'Umar was in a state of hurry on a journey, he combined the sunset and 'Isha' prayers after the twilight had disappeared, and he would say that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was in a state of hurry on a journey, he combined the sunset and 'Isha' prayers.
[1510]
Salim reported from his father to be saying: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) combining the sunset and Isha' prayers when he was in a hurry on a journey.
[1511]
Salim b. 'Abdullah reported that his father had said: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) delaying the sunset prayer till he would combine it with the 'Isha' when he hastened to set out on a journey.
[1512]
Anas b. Malik reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) set out on a journey before the sun declined (from the meridian), he delayed the noon prayer till the afternoon prayer, and then dismounted (his ride) and combined them (noon and afternoon prayers), but if the sun had declined before his setting out on a journey, he observed the noon prayer and then mounted (the ride).
[1513]
Anas reported: When the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) intended to combine two prayers on a journey, he delayed the noon prayer till came the early time of the afternoon prayer, and then combined the two.
[1514]
Anas reported that when the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had to set out on a journey hurriedly, he delayed the noon prayer to the earlier time for the afternoon prayer, and then he would combine them, and he would delay the sunset prayer to the time when the twilight would disappear and then combine it with the 'Isha' prayer.
[1515]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed the noon and afternoon prayers together, and the sunset and Isha' prayers together without being in a state of fear or in a state of journey.
[1516]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed the noon and afternoon prayers together in Medina without being in a state of fear or in a state of journey. (Abu Zubair said: I asked Sa'id [one of the narrators] why he did that. He said: I asked Ibn 'Abbas as you have asked me, and he replied that he [the Holy Prophet] wanted that no one among his Ummah should be put to [unnecessary] hardship.)
[1517]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) combined the prayers as he set on a journey in the expedition to Tabuk. He combined the noon prayer with the afternoon prayer and the sunset prayer with the 'Isha' prayer. Sa'id (one of the rawis) said to Ibn 'Abbas: What prompted him to do this? He said: He wanted that his Ummah should not be put to (unnecessary) hardship.
[1518]
Mu'adh reported: We set out with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the Tabuk expedition, and he observed the noon and afternoon prayers together and the sunset and 'Isha' prayers together.
[1519]
Mu'adh b. Jabal reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) combined in the expedition to Tabuk the noon prayer with the afternoon prayer and the sunset prayer with the 'Isha' prayer. He (one of the narrators) said: What prompted him to do that? He (Mu'adh) replied that he (the Holy Prophet) wanted that his Ummah should not be put to (unnecessary) hardship.
[1520]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) combined the noon prayer with the afternoon prayer and the sunset prayer with the 'Isha' prayer in Medina without being in a state of danger or rainfall. And in the hadith transmitted by Waki' (the words are): "I said to Ibn 'Abbas: What prompted him to do that? He said: So that his (Prophet's) Ummah should not be put to (unnecessary) hardship." And in the hadith transmitted by Mu'awiya (the words are): "It was said to Ibn 'Abbas: What did he intend thereby? He said he wanted that his Ummah should not be put to unnecessary hardship."
[1521]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: I observed with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) eight (rak'ahs) in combination, and seven rak'ahs in combination. I (one of the narrators) said: O Abd Sha'tha', I think that he (the Holy Prophet) had delayed the noon prayer and hastened the afternoon prayer, and he delayed the sunset prayer and hastened the 'Isha' prayer. He said: I also think so.
[1522]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed in Medina seven (rak'ahs) and eight (rak'ahs), i.e. (be combined) the noon and afternoon prayers (eight rak'ahs) and the sunset and 'Isha' prayers (seven rak'ahs).
[1523]
'Abdullah b. Shaqiq reported: Ibn 'Abbas one day addressed us in the afternoon (after the afternoon prayer) till the sun disappeared and the stars appeared, and the people began to say: Prayer, prayer. A person from Banu Tamim came there. He neither slackened nor turned away, but (continued crying): Prayer, prayer. Ibn 'Abbas said: May you be deprived of your mother, do you teach me Sunnah? And then he said: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) combining the noon and afternoon prayers and the sunset and 'Isha' prayers. 'Abdullah b. Shaqiq said: Some doubt was created in my mind about it. So I came to Abu Huraira and asked him (about it) and he testified his assertion.
[1524]
'Abdullah b. Shaqiq al-'Uqaili reported: A person said to Ibn 'Abbas (as he delayed the prayer): Prayer. He kept silence. He again said: Prayer. He again kept silence, and he again cried: Prayer. He again kept silence and said: May you be deprived of your mother, do you teach us about prayer? We used to combine two prayers during the life of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[1525]
Abdullah reported: None of you should give a share to Satan out of your self. He should not deem that it is necessary for him to turn but to the right only (after prayer). I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) turning to the left.
[1526]
A hadith like this has been narrated by A'mash, with the same chain of transmitters.
[1527]
Suddi reported : I asked Anas how I should turn-to the right or to the left-when I say my prayers. He said : I have very often seen the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) turning to the right.
[1528]
Anas reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to turn to the right (at the end of the prayer).
[1529]
Bara' reported: When we prayed behind the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) we cherished to be on his right side so that his face would turn towards us (at the end of the prayer), and he (the narrator) said: I heard him say: O my Lord ! save me from Thy torment on the Day when Thoil, wouldst raise or gather Thy servants.
[1530]
This hadith has been reported by Mis'ar with the same chain of transmitters, but he made no mention of: "His face would turn towards us."
[1531]
Abu Huraira reported the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: When the prayer commences then there is no prayer (valid), but the obligatory prayer. This hadith has been narrated by Warqa' with the same chain of transmitters.
[1532]
Abu Huraira reported the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: When the prayer commences, there is no prayer but the obligatory one.
[1533]
A hadith like this has been reported by Ishaq with the same chain of transmitters.
[1534]
This hadith has been narrated by Abu Huraira with another chain of transmitters. Hammad (one of the narrators) said : I then met 'Amr (the other narrator) and he narrated it to me, but it was not transmitted directly from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[1535]
'Abdullah b. Malik b. Buhaina reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by a person who was busy in praying while the (Fard of the) dawn prayer had commenced. He said something to him, which we do not know what it was. When we turned back we surrounded him and said: What is it that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to you ? He replied : He (the Holy Prophet) had said to me that he perceived as if one of them was about to observe four (rak'ahs) of the dawn prayer. Qa'nabi reported that 'Abdullah b. Malik b. Buhaina narrated it on the authority of his father. (Abu'l-Husain Muslim said) : His assertion that he has narrated this hadith on the authority of his father is not correct.
[1536]
Ibn Buhaina reported: The dawn prayer had commenced when the Messen- ger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saw a person observing prayer, whereas the Mu'adhdhin had pronounced the Iqama. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) remarked: Do you say four (rak'ahs) of Fard in the dawn prayer?
[1537]
'Abdullah b. Sarjis reported: A person entered the mosque, while the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was leading the dawn prayer. He observed two rak'ahs in a corner of the mosque, and then joined the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in prayer. When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had pronounced salutations (he had concluded the prayer), he said: O, so and so, which one out of these two prayers did you count (as your Fard prayer), the one that you observed alone or the prayer that you observed with us ?
[1538]
Abu Usaid reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you enters the mosque, he should say: "O Allah ! open for me the doors of Thy mercy"; and when he steps out he should say: 'O Allah ! I beg of Thee Thy Grace." (Imam Muslim said: I heard Yahya saying: I transcribed this hadith from the compilation of Sulaiman b. Bilal.)
[1539]
A hadith like this has been narrated from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) by Abu Usaid.
[1540]
Abu Qatada (a Companion of the Prophet) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you enters the mosque, he should observe two rak'ahs (of Nafl prayer) before sitting.
[1541]
Abu Qatada, a Companion of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), said: I entered the mosque, when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had been sitting among people, and I also sat down among them. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: What prevented you from offering two rak'ahs (of Nafl prayer) before sitting down? I said: Messenger of Allah, I saw you sitting and people sitting (around you and I, therefore, sat in your company). He (the Holy Prophet) then said: When anyone among you enters the mosque, he should not sit till he has observed two rak'ahs.
[1542]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) owed me a debt; he paid me back and made an addition (of this). I entered the mosque and he (the Holy Prophet) said to me: Observe two rak'ahs of prayer.
[1543]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) bought a camel from me. When he came back to Medina, he ordered me to come to the mosque and observed two rak'ahs of prayer.
[1544]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: I went with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on an expedition and my camel delayed me and I was exhausted. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) thus came earlier than I, whereas I came on the next day and went to the mosque and found him (the Holy Prophet) at the gate of the mosque. He said: It is now that you have come. I said. Yes. He said: Leave your camel and enter (the mosque) and observe two rak'ahs. He (the narrator) said: So I entered and observed (two rak'ahs) of prayer and then went back.
[1545]
Ka'b b. Malik reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not come back from the journey but by day in the forenoon, and when he arrived, he went first to the mosque, and having prayed two rak'ahs in it he sat down in it.
[1546]
'Abdullah b. Shaqiq reported: I asked 'A'isha whether the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe the forenoon prayer. She said: No, but when he came back from the journey.
[1547]
'Abdullah b. Shaqiq reported: I aksed 'A'isha whether the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe the forenoon prayer. She said: No, except when he came back from a journey.
[1548]
'Urwa reported 'A'isha to be sayidg: I have never seen the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observing the supererogatory prayer of the forenoon, but I observed it. And if the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) abandoned any act which he in fact loved to do, it was out of fear that if the people practised it constantly, it might become obligatory for them.
[1549]
Mu'adha asked 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) how many rak'ahs Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prayed at the forenoon prayer. She replied: Four rak'ahs, but sometimes more as he pleased.
[1550]
A hadith like this has been reported by the same chain of transmitters, but with this alteration that the transmitter said: "As Allah pleased."
[1551]
Mua'ada 'Adawiyya reported 'A'isha as saying: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe four rak'ahs in the forenoon prayer and he sometimes observed more as Allah pleased.
[1552]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Qatada with the same chain of transmitters.
[1553]
Abd al-Rahman b. Abu Laila reported : No one has ever narrated to me that he saw the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observing the forenoon prayer, except Umm Hani. She, however, narrated that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) entered her house on the day of the Conquest of Mecca and prayed eight rak'ahs (adding) : I never saw a shorter prayer than it except that he performed the bowing and prostration completely. But (one of the narrators) Ibn Bashshar in his narration made no mention of the word : "Never".
[1554]
'Abdullah b. Harith b. Naufal reported : I had been asking about, as I was desirous to find one among people who should inform me, whether the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed the forenoon prayer, but I found none to narrate that to me except Umm Hani, daughter of Abu Talib (the real sister of Hadrat 'Ali), who told me that on the day of the Conquest the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came (to our house) after the dawn had (sufficiently) arisen. A cloth was brought and privacy was provided for him (the Holy Prophet). He took a bath and then stood up and observed eight rak'ahs. I do not know whether his Qiyam (standing posture) was longer, or bending or prostration or all of them were of equal duration. She (Umm Hani) further said : I never saw him saying this Nafl prayer prior to it or subsequently. (Al-Muradi narrated on the authority of Yunus that he made no mention of the words: "He informed me.")
[1555]
Abu Murra, the freed slave of Umm Hani, daughter of Abu Talib, reported Umm Hani to be saying: I went to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the day of the Conquest of Mecca and found him taking bath, and Fatimah, his daughter, had provided him privacy with the help of a cloth. I gave him salutation and he said: Who is she? I said: It is Umm Hani, daughter of Abu Talib. He (the Holy Prophet) said : Greeting for Umm Hani. When he had completed the bath, he stood up and observed eight rak'ahs wrapped up in one cloth. When he turned back (after the prayer), I said to him: Messenger of Allah, the son of my mother 'Ali b. Abu Talib is going to kill a person, Fulan b. Hubaira whom I have given protection. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) said: We too have given protection whom you have given protection, O Umm Hani. Umm Hani said: It was the forenoon (prayer).
[1556]
Abu Murra narrated on the authority of Umm Hani that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the day of the Conquest of Mecca observed in her house eight rak'abs of prayer in one cloth, its opposite corners having been tied from the opposite sides.
[1557]
Abu Dharr reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: In the morning charity is due from every bone in the body of every one of you. Every utterance of Allah's glorification is an act of charity. Every utterance of praise of Him is an act of charity, every utterance of profession of His Oneness is an act of charity, every utterance of profession of His Greatness is an act of charity, enjoining good is an act of charity, forbidding what is distreputable is an act of charity, and two rak'ahs which one prays in the forenoon will suffice.
[1558]
Abu Huraira reported. My friend (the Holy Prophet, may peace be upon him) has instructed me to do three things : three fasts during every month, two rak'ahs of the forenoon prayer, and observing Witr prayer before going to bed.
[1559]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Abu Huraira by another chain of transmitters.
[1560]
Abu Huraira reported: My friend Abu'l-Qasim (may peace be upon him) instructed me to do three things, and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1561]
Abu Murra, the freed slave of Umm Hani, narrated on the authority of Abu Darda' : My Friend (may peace be upon him) instructed me in three (acts), and I would never abandon them as long as I live. (And these three things are) : Three fasts during every month, the forenoon prayer, and this that I should not sleep till I have observed the Witr prayer.
[1562]
Ibn 'Umar reported that Hafsa, the Mother of the Believers, informed him that when the Mu'adhdhin became silent after calling (people) to the dawn prayer, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commenced the dawn (prayer) when it dawned by observing two short rak'ahs before the commencement of the (Fard) prayer.
[1563]
This hadith has been transmitted by Nafi' with the same chain of narrators.
[1564]
Hafsa reported that when it was dawn, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not observe (any other prayers) but two short rak'ahs.
[1565]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[1566]
Hafsa reported: When the dawn appeared, the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed two rak'ahs (of Sunnah prayers).
[1567]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe two rak'ahs of Sunnah (prayer) when he heard the Adhin and shortened them. (This hadith has been narrated by the same chain of transmitters and in the hadith narrated by Usama the words are: "When it was dawn".)
[1568]
'A'isha reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe two (supererogatory) rak'ahs in between the call to prayer and the Iqama of the dawn prayer.
[1569]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed two rak'ahs of the dawn prayer and he shortened them (to the extent) that I (out of surprise) said: Did he recite in them Surah Fatiha (only)?
[1570]
'A'isha reported: When it was dawn, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed two rak'ahs, and I would say: Does he recite only the opening chapter of the Qur'an in it?
[1571]
'A'isha reported that the Apostle (may peace be upon him) was not so much particular about observing supererogatory rak'ahs as in case of the two rak'ahs of the dawn prayer.
[1572]
'A'isha reported: I have never seen the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) hastening as much in observing supererogatory as two rak'ahs before the (Fard) of the dawn prayer.
[1573]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger as saying: The two rak'ahs at dawn are better than this world and what it contains.
[1574]
'A'isha reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said about the two (supererogatory) rak'ahs of the dawn: They are dearer to me than the whole world.
[1575]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited in the two (supererogatory) rak'ahs of the dawn (prayer): "Say: O unbelievers," (Qur'an, cix.) and "Say: Allah is one" (cxii.).
[1576]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite in first of the two (supererogatory) rak'ahs of the dawn: "Say: We believed in Allah and what was revealed to us.. ." verses 285-286 from Surah Baqara, and in the second of the two: "I believe in Allah and I bear testimony that we are Muslims" (iii. 51).
[1577]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite in the two (supererogatory) rak'ahs of the dawn prayer: "Say: We believed in Allah and what was revealed to us" and that which is found in Surah Al-i-'lmran:"Come to that word (creed) which is common between you and us"(iii. 64).
[1578]
This hadith has been transmitted by another chain of narrators.
[1579]
Umm Habiba (the wife of the Holy Prophet) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A house will be built in Paradise, for anyone who prays in a day and a night twelve rak'ahs; and she added: I have never abandoned (observing them) since I heard it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). Some of the other narrators said the same words: I have never abandoned (observing them) since I heard (from so and so).
[1580]
Nu'man b. Salim reported with the same chain of transmitters: He who observed twelve voluntary rak'ahs, a house will be built for him in Paradise.
[1581]
Umm Habiba, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If any Muslim servant (of Allah) prays for the sake of Allah twelve rak'ahs (of Sun'an) every day, over and above the obligatory ones, Allah will build for him a house in Paradise, or a house will be built for him in Paradise; and I have not abandoned to observe the in after (hearing it from the Messenger of Allah). (So said also 'Amr and Nu'man.)
[1582]
Umm Habiba reported the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) having said: If any Muslim servant (of Allah) performed ablution, and performed it well, and then observed every day, the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1583]
Ibn 'Umar reported: I prayed along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) two rak'ahs before and two rak'ahs after the noon prayer, two rak'ahs after the sunset prayer and two rak'ahs after the 'Isha' prayer and two rak'ahs after the Friday prayer; and so far as the sunset, 'Isha' and Friday prayers are concerned, I observed (them) along with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) in his house.
[1584]
'Abdullah b. Shaqiq said: I asked 'A'isha about the Messenger of Allah's (may peace be upon him) voluntary prayers, and she replied : Before the noon prayer, he used to pray four rak'abs in my house; then would go out and lead the people in prayer ; then come in and pray two rak'ahs. He would then lead the people in the sunset prayer; then come in and pray two rak'abs. Then he would lead the people in the 'Isha' prayer, and enter my house and pray two rak'ahs. He would pray nine rak'ahs during the night, including Witr. At night he would pray for a long time standing and for a long time sitting, and when he recited the Holy Qur'an while standing, he would bow and prostrate himself from the standing position, and when he recited while sitting, he would bow and prostrate himself from the sitting position, and when it was dawn he would pray two rak'ahs.
[1585]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) would pray in the night for a long time, and when he prayed standing be bowed in a standing posture, and when he prayed sitting, he bowed in a sitting posture.
[1586]
'Abdullah b. Shaqiq reported: I fell ill in Persia and therefore, prayed in a sitting posture, and I asked 'A'isha about it and she said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prayed for a long time in the night sitting.
[1587]
'Abdullah b. Shaqiq al-'Uqaili reported: I asked 'A'isha about the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) during the night (i.e. Tahajjud prayer) She replied: He used to pray for a long time standing and for a long time sitting in the night, and when he recited the Qur'an while standing, he would bow himself from the standing position, and when he recited while sitting, he would bow from the sitting position.
[1588]
'Abdullah b. Shaqiq al-'Uqaili reported: I asked 'A'isha about the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). She said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) would observe prayer (Nafl) in a standing position as well as in a sitting position, and when he commenced the prayer in a standing position, he bowed in this very position, and when he commenced the prayer in a sitting position, he bowed in this very position.
[1589]
'A'isha reported: I did not see the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) reciting (the Qur'an) in the night prayer in a sitting position, till he grew old and then he recited (it) in a sitting position, but when thirty or forty verses were left out of the Surah, he would then stand up, recite them and then bowed.
[1590]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to pray while sitting (when he grew old) and he recited in this position and when the recitation equal to thirty or forty verses was left, he would then stand up and recite (for this duration) in a standing position and then bowed himself and then prostrated himself and did the same in the second rak'ah.
[1591]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite in sitting position (while observing the Tahajjud prayer) and when he intended to bow, he would stand up and recite (for the duration in which) a man (ordinarily) recites forty verses.
[1592]
Alqama b. Waqqas reported: I asked 'A'isha how the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did in the two rak'ahs as he (observed them) sitting. She said: He would recite (the Qur'an) in them, and when he intended to bow, he would stand up and then bowed.
[1593]
'Abdullah b. Shaqiq reported: I asked 'A'isha whether the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed (Nafl) sitting. She said: Yes, when the people had made him old.
[1594]
'Abdullah b. Shaqiq reported: I said to 'A'isha and she made a mention of that (recorded above) about the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[1595]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) died (in this very state) that he observed most of his (Nafl) prayers in a sitting position.
[1596]
'A'isha reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) grew bulky and heavy he would observe (most of his Nafl) prayers sitting.
[1597]
Hafsa reported: Never did I see the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observing supererogatory prayer sitting till one year before his death when he would observe Nafl prayer in a sitting position, and he would recite the Surah (of the Qur'an) in such a slow-measured tone (that duration of its recital) became more lengthy than the one longer than this.
[1598]
Zuhri reported this hadith with the same chain of transmitters, except this that he made a mention of one year or two years.
[1599]
Jabir b. Samura reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed (Nafl) prayer sitting before his death.
[1600]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr reported: It was narrated to me that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: The prayer observed by a person sitting is half of the prayer. I came to him (may peace be upon him) and found him praying in a sitting position. I placed my hand on his head. He said: O 'Abdullah b. 'Amr, what is the matter with you? I said: Messenger of Allah, it has been narrated to me that you said: The prayer of a man in a sitting position is half of the prayer, whereas you are observing prayer sitting. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Yes, it is so, but I am not like anyone amongst you.
[1601]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Abu Yahya al-A'raj with the same chain of transmitters.
[1602]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to pray eleven rak'ahs at night, observing the Witr with a single rak'ah, and when he had finished them, he lay down on his right side, till the Mu'adhdhin came to him and he (the Holy Prophet) then observed two short rak'ahs (of Sunan of the dawn prayer).
[1603]
'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), said that between the time when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) finished the 'Isha' prayer which is called 'Atama by the people, he used to pray eleven rak'ahs, uttering the salutation at the end of every two rak'ahs, and observing the Witr with a single one. And when the Mu'adhdhin had finished the call (for the) dawn prayer and he saw the dawn clearly and the Mu'adhdhin had come to him, he stood up and prayed two short rak'ahs. Then he lay down on his right side till the Mu'adhdhin came to him for lqama. (This hadith has been narrated with the same chain of transmitters by Ibn Shihab, but in it no mention has been made of Iqama )
[1604]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe thirteen rak'ahs of the night prayer. Five out of them consisted of Witr, and he did not sit, but at the end (for salutation).
[1605]
This hadith has been narrated by Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[1606]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to pray thirteen rak'ahs during the night including the two rak'ahs (Sunan) of the dawn prayer.
[1607]
Abu Salama b. Abd al-Rahman asked 'A'isha about the (night) prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) during the month of Ramadan. She said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not observe either in Ramadan or in other months more than eleven rak'ahs (of the night prayer). He (in the first instance) observed four rak'ahs. Ask not about their excellence and their length (i.e. these were matchless in perfection and length). He again observed four rak'ahs, and ask not about their excellence and their length. He would then observe three rak'ahs (of the Witr prayer). 'A'isha again said: I said: Messenger of Allah, do you sleep before observing the Witr prayer? He said: O 'A'isha, my eyes sleep but my heart does not sleep.
[1608]
Abu Salama asked 'A'isha about the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) She said: He observed thirteen rak'ahs (in the night prayer). He observed eight rak'ahs and would then observe Witr and then observe two rak'ahs sitting, and when he wanted to bow he stood up and then bowed down, and then observed two rak'ahs in between the Adhan and lqama of the dawn prayer.
[1609]
Abu Salama reported that he asked 'A'isha about the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) (during the night). The rest of the hadith is the same but with this exception that he (the Holy Prophet) observed nine rak'ahs including Witr.
[1610]
Abu Salama is reported to have said. I came to 'A'isha. I said: O mother, inform me about the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). She said: His (night prayer) in Ramadan and (during other months) was thirteen rak'ahs at night including two rak'ahs of fajr.
[1611]
It is reported on the authority of 'A'isha that the prayer of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in the night consisted of ten rak'ahs. He observed a Witr and two rak'ahs (of Sunan) of the dawn prayer, and thus the total comes to thirteen rak'ahs.
[1612]
'A'isha thus reported about the (night prayer) of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him): He used to sleep in the early part of the night, and woke up in the latter part. If he then wished intercourse with his wife, he satisfied his desire, and then went to sleep; and when the first call to prayer was made he jumped up (by Allah, she, i.e. 'A'isha, did not say "he stood up"), and poured water over him (by Allah she, i.e. 'A'isha, did not say that he took a bath but I know what she meant) and if he did not have an intercourse, he performed ablution, just as a man performs ablution for prayer and then observed two rak'ahs.
[1613]
'A'isha observed that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe prayer in the night and the last of his (night) prayer was Witr.
[1614]
Masruq is reported to have asked 'A'isha about the action (most pleasing to) the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). She said: He (the Holy Prophet) loved (that action) which one keeps on doing regularly. I said (to 'A'isha): When did he pray (at night)? She replied: When he heard the cock crow, he got up and observed prayer.
[1615]
'A'isha reported: Never did the earlier part of the dawn find the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) but sleeping in my house or near me.
[1616]
'A'isha reported: When the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had prayed the two rak'ahs (Sunan) of the dawn prayer, he would talk to me if I was awake, otherwise he would lie down.
[1617]
A hadith like this has been narrated by 'A'isha by another chain of transmitters.
[1618]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to pray in the night and when he observed Witr, he said to me: O 'A'isha, get up and observe Witr.
[1619]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to offer prayer at night while she lay in front of him, and when the Witr prayer was yet to be observed, he would awaken her and she observed Witr.
[1620]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed the Witr prayer every night and he completed Witr at the time of dawn.
[1621]
Masruq reported on the authority of 'A'isha that she said that the Messenger Of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe the Witr prayer every night, maybe in the early part of night, at midnight and in the latter part, finishing his Witr at dawn.
[1622]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe Witr every night, and he would (at times) complete his Witr at the end of the night.
[1623]
Sa'd b. Hisham b. 'Amir decided to participate in the expedition for the sake of Allah, so he came to Medina and he decided to dispose of his property there and buy arms and horses instead and fight against the Romans to the end of his life. When he came to Medina, he met the people of Medina. They dissuaded him to do such a thing, and informed him that a group of six men had decided to do so during the lifetime of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade them to do it, and said: Is there not for you a model pattern in me? And when they narrated this to him (Sa'd b. Hisham), he returned to his wife, though he had divorced her and made (people) witness to his reconciliation. He then came to Ibn 'Abbas and asked him about the Witr of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). Ibn 'Abbas said: Should I not lead you to one who knows best amongst the people of the world about the Witr of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)? He said: Who is it? He (Ibn 'Abbas) said: It is 'A'isha. So go to her and ask her (about Witr) and then come to me and inform me about her answer that she would give you. So I came to Hakim b. Aflah and requested him to take me to her. He said : I would not go to her, for I forbade her to speak anything (about the conflict) between the two groupS, but she refused (to accept my advice) and went (to participate in that corflict). I (requested) him (Hakim) with an oath to lead me to her. So we went to 'A'isha and we begged permission to meet her. She granted us permission and we went in. She said: Are you Hakim? (She recognised him.) He replied: Yes. She said: Who is there with you ? He said: He is Sa'd b. Hisham. She said: Which Hisham ? He said: He is Hisham b. 'Amir. She blessed him ('Amir) with mercy from Allah and spoke good of him (Qatada said that he died as a martyr in Uhud). I said: Mother of the Faithful, tell me about the character of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). She said: Don't you read the Qur'an ? I said: Yes. Upon this she said: The character of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was the Qur'an. He said: I felt inclined to get up and not ask anything (further) till death. But then I changed my mind and said: Inform me about the observance (of the night prayer) of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). She said: Did you not recite: "O thou wrapped up"? He said: Yes. She said: Allah, the Exalted and the Glorious, made the observance of the night prayer at the beginning of this Surah obligatory. So the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him and his Companions around him observed this (night prayer) for one year. Allah held back the concluding portion of this Surah for twelve months in the Heaven till (at the end of this period) Allah revealed the concluding verses of this Surah which lightened (the burden of this prayer), and the night prayer became a supererogatory prayer after being an obligatory one. I said: Mother of the Faithful, inform me about the Witr of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). She said: I used to prepare tooth stick for him and water for his ablution, and Allah would rouse him to the extent He wished during the night. He would use the tooth stick, and perform ablution, and would offer nine rak'ahs, and would not sit but in the eighth one and would remember Allah, and praise Him and supplicate Him, then he would get up without uttering the salutation and pray the ninth rak'ah. He would then sit, remember, praise Him and supplicate Him and then utter a salutation loud enough for us to hear. He would then pray two rak'ahs sitting after uttering the salutation, and that made eleven rak'ahs. O my son, but when the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) grew old and put on flesh, he observed Witr of seven, doing in the two rak'ahs as he had done formerly, and that made nine. O my son, and when the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed prayer, he liked to keep on observing it, and when sleep or pain overpowered him and made it impossible (for him) to observe prayer in the night, he prayed twelve rak'ahs daring the day. I am not aware of Allah's Prophet (may peace be upon him) having recited the whole Qur'an during one single night, or praying through the night till morning, or fasting a complete month, except Ramadan. He (the narrator) said: I then went to Ibn 'Abbas and narrated to him the hadith (transmitted from her), and he said : She says the truth If I went to her and got into her presence, I would have listened to it orally from her. He said : If I were to know that you do not go to her. I would not have transmitted this hadith to you narrated by her.
[1624]
Zurara b. Aufa said that Sa'd b. Hisham divorced his wife, and then proceeded to Medina to sell his property, and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1625]
Sa'd b. Hisham reported: I went to 'Abdullah b. 'Abbas and asked him about the Witr prayer, and the rest of the hadith is the same as recorded in this event. She (Hadrat 'A'isha) said: Who is that Hisham ? I said: Son of 'Amir. She said: What a fine man 'Amir was ! He died as a martyr in the Battle of Uhud.
[1626]
Zurara b. Aufa reported that Sa'd b. Hisham was his neighbour and he informed him that he had divorced his wife and he narrated the hadith like the one transmitted by Sa'd. She ('A'isha) said: Who is Hisham? He said: The son of 'Amir. She said: What a fine man he was; he participated in the Battle of Uhud along with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). Hakim b. Aflah said: If I ever knew that you do not go to 'A'isha, I would not have informed you about her hadith (So that you would have gone to her and heard it from her orally).
[1627]
'A'isha reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) missed the night prayer due to pain or any other reason, he observed twelve rak'ahs during the daytime.
[1628]
'A'isha reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) decided upon doing any act, he continued to do it, and when he slept at night or fell sick he observed twelve rak'ahs during the daytime. I am not aware of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observing prayer during the whole of the night till morning, or observing fast for a whole month continuously except that of Ramadan.
[1629]
'Umar b. Khattab reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Should anyone fall asleep and fail to recite his portion of the Qur'an, or a part of it, if he recites it between the dawn prayer and the noon prayer, it will be recorded for him as though he had recited it during the night.
[1630]
Zaid b. Arqam, on seeing some people praying in the forenoon, said: They well know that prayer at another time than this is more excellent, for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The prayer of those who are penitent is observed when your weaned camels feel the heat of the sun.
[1631]
Zaid b. Arqam reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out to the people of Quba' and saw them observing prayer; upon this he said: The prayer of the penitent should be observed when the young weaned camels feel heat of the sun.
[1632]
Ibn 'Umar reported that a person asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about the night prayer. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : Prayer during the night should consist of pairs of rak'ahs, but if one of you fears morning is near, he should pray one rak'ah which will make his prayer an odd number for him.
[1633]
Salim reported on the authority of his father that a person asked the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) about the night prayer. He said: It consists of pairs of rak'ahs, but if one fears morning is near, he should make it an odd number by praying one rak'ah.
[1634]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported: A man stood up and said. Messenger of Allah, how is the night prayer? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The night prayer consists of pair, but if you apprehend the rise of dawn, make it odd number by observing one rak'ah.
[1635]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported: A person asked the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as I stood between him (the Holy Prophet) and the inquirer and he said: Messenger of Allah, how is the night prayer? He (the Holy Prophet) said: It consists of pairs of rak'ahs, but if you apprehend morning, you should pray one rak'ah and make the end of your prayer as Witr. Then a person asked him (the Holy Prophet) at the end of the year and I was at that place near the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him); but I do not know whether he was the same person or another person, but he (the Holy Prophet) gave him the same reply.
[1636]
This hadith his been narrated by Ibn 'Umar by another chain of trans- mitters but it does not have these words: "Then a person asked him at the end of the year," and what follows subsequently.
[1637]
Ibn 'Umar reported the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as say- ing: Hasten to pray Witr before morning.
[1638]
Ibn 'Umar said: He who prayed at night should make Witr the end of his prayer, for the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) ordered this.
[1639]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Make Witr the end of your night prayer.
[1640]
Nafi' reported Ibn 'Umar as saying: He who observed the night prayer should make Witr the end of his prayer before dawn. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to order them thus.
[1641]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: Witr is a rak'ah at the end of the prayer.
[1642]
Ibn Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Witr is a rak'ah at the end of the night prayer.
[1643]
Abu Mijlaz reported: I asked Ibn 'Abbas about the Witr prayer. He said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is a rak'ah at the end of the night prayer.
[1644]
Ibn 'Umar reported: A person called (the attention) of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as he was in the mosque, and said: Messenger of Allah, how should I make the rak'ahs of the night prayer an odd number? Upon this the Messenger of Allah (way peace he upon him) said: He who prays (night prayer) he should observe it in pairs, but if he apprehends the rise of morning, he should observe one rak'ah; that would make the number odd (for the rak'ahs) observed by him. This was narrated by Abd Kuraib 'Ubaidullah b. 'Abdullah and Ibn 'Umar did not make mention of it.
[1645]
Anas b. Sirin reported: I asked Ibn 'Umar to tell me about the practice of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) in regard to two rak'ahs before the dawn prayer: Should I make lengthy recitation in them? He said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe, the night prayer in pairs and then made the number odd by observing one rak'ah. I said: I am not asking you about it. He said: You are a bulky man, will you not show me the patience to narrate to you the hadith completely? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe the night prayer in pairs and then made the number odd by observing one rak'ah, and then he observed two rak'ahs before dawn quite close to the call for prayer (Khalaf said: "Did you see [yourself the Holy Prophet observing] the two rak'ahs before the dawn?" and he made no mention of prayer.)
[1646]
Anas b. Sirin reported: I asked Ibn 'Umar like this (as recorded in the previous hadith) and he made this addition: "And he (the Holy Prophet) made the end of the night prayer as odd number by one rak'ah." And there is also (this addition): "Stop, stop, you are bulky."
[1647]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The night prayer consists of pairs and when you see the approach of dawn, make this number odd by one rak'ah. It was said to Ibn 'Umar: What does the (word) pair imply? He said: (It means) that salutation is uttered after every two rak'ahs.
[1648]
Abu Sa'id (al Khudri) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Observe Witr prayer before it is morning. Abu Sa'id reported that they (the Prophet's Companions) asked the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) about Witr (prayer). (In reply to their inquiry) he said: Observe Witr prayer before it is morning.
[1649]
Abu Sa'id reported that they (some of the Companions) of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) asked the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) about Witr. He said: Observe Witr before morning.
[1650]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If anyone is afraid that he may not get up in the latter part of the night, he should observe Witr in the first part of it; and if anyone is eager to get up in the last part of it, he should observe Witr at the end of the night, for prayer at the end of the night is witnessed (by the angels) and that is preferable.
[1651]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who amongst you is afraid that he may not be able to get up at the end of the night should observe Witr (in the first part) and then sleep, and he who is confident of getting up and praying at night (i.e. Tahajjud prayer) should observe it at the end of it, for the recitation at the end of the night to visited (by angels), and that is excellent.
[1652]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The most excellent prayer is that in which the duration of standing is longer.
[1653]
Jabir reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was asked about the prayer which was most excellent. He said: That in which the standing is longer. (This hadith is narrated by another chain of transmitters too.)
[1654]
Jabir said he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: There is an hour during the night in which no Muslim individual will ask Allah for good in this world and the next without His giving it to him; and that applies to every night.
[1655]
Jabir reported: I heard the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is an hour during the night in which no Muslim bondman will ask Allah for good in this world and the next but He will grant it to him.
[1656]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Our Lord, the Blessed and the Exalted, descends every night to the lowest heaven when one-third of the latter part of the night is left, and says: Who supplicates Me so that I may answer him ? Who asks Me so that I may give to him ? Who asks Me forgiveness so that I may forgive him ?
[1657]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah descends every night to the lowest heaven when one-third of the first part of the night is over and says: I am the Lord; I am the Lord: who is there to supplicate Me so that I answer him ? Who is there to beg of Me so that I grant him ? Who is there to beg forgiveness from Me so that I forgive him ? He continues like this till the day breaks.
[1658]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When half of the night or two-third of it is over. Allah, the Blessed and the Exalted, descends to the lowest heaven and says: Is there any beggar, so that he be given ? Is there any supplicator so that he be answered ? Is there any beggar of forgiveness so that he be forgiven? (And Allah continues it saying) till it is daybreak.
[1659]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah descends to the lowest heaven at half of the night or at one-third of the latter part and says: Who is there to supplicate Me so that I answer him? Who is there to ask Me so that I grant him? And then says: Who will lend to One Who is neither indigent nor tyrant? (This hadith has been narrated by Sa'd b. Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters with this addition: "Then the Blessed and the Exalted (Lord) stretches His Hands and says: Who will lend to One Who is neither indigent nor tyrant?)
[1660]
Abu Sa'id and Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah waits till when one-third of the first part of the night is over; He descends to the lowest heaven and says: It there any supplicator of forgiveness? Is there any penitant? Is there any petitioner (for mercy and favour) ? Is there any solicitor ?-till it is daybreak.
[1661]
This hadith is narrated by Ishaq with the same chain uf transmitters except this that the hadith transmitted by Mansur (the above one) is more comprehensive and lengthy.
[1662]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who observed prayer at night during Ramadan, because of faith and seeking his reward from Allah, his previous sins would be forgiven.
[1663]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to exhort (his Companions) to pray (at night) during Ramadan without commanding them to observe it as an obligatory act, and say: He who observed the night prayer in Ramadan because of faith and seeking his reward (from Allah), all his previous sins would be forgiven. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died, this was the practice, and it continued thus during Abu Bakr's caliphate and the early part of 'Umar's caliphate.
[1664]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who observed the fasts of Ramadan with faith and seeking reward (from Allah), all his previous sins would be forgiven, and he who observed prayer on Lailat-ul- Qadr with faith and seeking reward (from Allah), all his previous sins would be forgiven.
[1665]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who prayed on the Lailat-ul-Qadr (the Majestic Night) knowing that it is (the same night). I (believe) that he (the Holy Prophet also) said: (He who does) it with faith and seeking reward (from Allah), his sins would be forgiven.
[1666]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prayed one night in the mosque and people also prayed along with him. He then prayed on the following night and there were many persons. Then on the third or fourth night (many people) gathered there, but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not come out to them (for leading the Tarawih prayer). When it was morning he said: I saw what you were doing, but I desisted to come to you (and lead the prayer) for I feared that this prayer might become obligatory for you. (He the narrator) said: It was the month of Ramadan.
[1667]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out during the night and observed prayer in the mosque and some of the people prayed along with him. When it was morning the people talked about this and so a large number of people gathered there. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out for the second night, and they (the people) prayed along with him. When it was morning the people began to talk about it. So the mosque thronged with people on the third night. He (the Holy Prophet) came out and they prayed along with him. When it was the fourth night, the mosque was filled to its utmost capacity but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not come out. Some persons among then cried: "Prayer." But the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not come to them till he came out for the morning prayer. When he had completed the morning prayer, he turned his face to the people and recited Tashahhud (I bear testi- mony that there is no god but Allah and I bear testimony that Muhammad is His Messen- ger) and then said: Your affair was not hidden from me in the night, but I was afraid that (my observing prayer continuously) might make the night prayer obligatory for you and you might be unable to perform it.
[1668]
Zirr (b. Hubaish) reported: I heard from Ubayy b. Ka'b a statement made by 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud in which he said : He who gets up for prayer (every night) during the year will hit upon Lailat-ul-Qadr. Ubayy said: By Allah I there is no god but He, that (Lailat-ul-Qadr) is in Ramadhan (He swore without reservation:) By Allah, I know the night; it is the night on which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded us to pray. It is that which precedes the morning of twenty-seventy and its indication is that the sun rises bright on that day without rays.
[1669]
Ubayy b Ka'b reported: By Allah, I know about Lailat-ul Qadr and I know it fully well that it is the twenty-seventh night (during Ramadan) on which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded us to observe prayer. (Shu'ba was in doubt about these words: "the night on which the Messenger of Allah [may peace be upon him] commanded us to observe the prayer." This has been transmitted to me by a friend of mine.)
[1670]
Shu'ba reported this hadith with the same chain of transmitters, but he made no mention that Shu'ba was in doubt and what follows subsequently.
[1671]
Ibn 'Abbas reported : I spent a night with my material aunt (sister of my mother) Maimuna. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) got up during the night and relieved himself, then washed his face and hands and went to sleep. He then got up again, and came to the water skin and loosened its straps, then performed good ablution between the two extremes. He then stood up and observed prayer. I also stood up and stretched my body fearing that he might be under the impression that I was there to find out (what he did at night). So I also performed ablution and stood up to pray, but I stood on his left. He took hold of my hand and made me go round to his right side. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) completed thirteen rak'abs of his night prayer. He then lay down and slept and snored (and it was his habit to snore while asleep). Then Bilal came and he informed him about the prayer. He (the Holy Prophet) then stood up for prayer and did not perform ablution, and his supplication included there words: "O Allah, place light in my heart, light in my sight, light in my hearing, light on my right hand, light on my left hand, light above me, light below me, light in front of me, light behind me, and enhance light for me."
Kuraib (the narrator) said: There are seven (words more) which are in my heart (but I cannot recall them) and I met some of the descendants of 'Abbas and they narrated these words to me and mentioned in them: (Light) in my sinew, in my flesh, in my blood, in my hair, in my skin, and made a mention of two more things.
[1672]
Kuraib, the freed slave of Ibn 'Abbas, reported that Ibn 'Abbas narrated to him that he spent a night in the house of Maimuna, the mother of the believers, who was his mother's sister. I lay down across the cushion, whereas the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and his wife lay down on it length-wise. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) slept up till midnight, or a little before midnight of a little after midnight, and then got up and began to cast off the effects of sleep from his face by rubbing with his hand, and then recited the ten concluding verses of Surah 'Imran. He then stood up near a hanging water-skin and performed ablution well, and then stood up and prayed, 'Ibn 'Abbas said: I also stood up and did the same, as the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had done, and then went to him and stood by his side. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) placed his right hand upon my head and took hold of my right ear and twistedit, and then observed a pair of rak'ahs, again a pair of rak'ahs, again a pair of rak'ahs, again a pair of rak'ahs, again a pair of rak'ahs, again a pair of rak'ahs, and then observed Witr and then lay down till the Mu'adhdhin came to him. He (the Holy Prophet) then stood up and observed two short rak'ahs, and then went out (to the mosque) and observed the dawn prayer.
[1673]
Makhrama b. Sulaiman narrated it with the same chain of narrators and he made this addition : "He then went to the water-skin and brushed his teeth and performed ablution well. He did not pour water but a little. He then awakened me and I stood up," and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1674]
Ibn Abbas reported: I slept (one night) in the house of Maimuna, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was with her that night. He (after sleeping for half of the night got up and) then performed ablution and then stood up and observed prayer. I too stood on his left side. He took hold of me and made me stand on his right side. He (the Holy Prophet) observed thirteen rak'ahs on that night. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then slept and snored and it was a habit with him to snore while sleeping. The Mu'adhdbin then came to him (to inform him about the prayer). He then went out and observed prayer without performing ablution. ('Amr said: Bukair b. Ashajj had narrated it to me )
[1675]
Ibn 'Abbas reported : I spent one night in the house of my mother's sister Maimuna, daughter of Harith, and said to her: Awake me when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stands to pray (at night). (She woke me up when) the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up for prayer. I stood on his left side. He took hold of my hand and made me stand on his right side, and whenever I dozed off he took hold of my earlobe (and made me alert). He (the narrator) said: He (the Holy Prophet) observed eleven rak'ahs. He then sat with his legs drawn and wrapped in his garment and slept so that I could bear his breathing while asleep. And when the dawn appeared, he observed two short rak'ahs of (Sunnah) prayer.
[1676]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that he spent a night in the house of his matenial aunt, Maimuna. The Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) got up at night and performed short ablution (taking water) from the water-skin hanging there. (Giving a description of the ablution Ibn 'Abbas said: It was short and performed with a little water.) I also got up and did the same as the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had done. I then came (to him) and stood on his left. He then made me go around to his right side. He then observed prayer and went to sleep till he began to snore. Bilal came to him and informed him about the prayer. He (the Holy Prophet) then went out and observed the dawn prayer without performing ablution. Sufyan said: It was a special (prerogative of the) Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) for it has been conveyed to us that the eyes of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) sleep, but his heart does not sleep.
[1677]
Ibn 'Abbas said: I spent the night in the house of my mother's sister, Maimuna, and observed how the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prayed (at night). He got up and relieved himself. He then washed his face and hands and then went to sleep. He again got up and went near the water-skin and loosened its straps and then poured some water in a bowl and inclined it with his hands (towards himself). He then performed a good ablution between the two extremes and then stood up to pray. I also came and stood by his left side. He took hold of me and made me stand on his right side. It was in thirteen rak'ahs that the (night) prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was completed. He then slept till he began to snore, and we knew that he had gone to sleep by his snoring. He then went out (for the dawn prayer) and then again slept, and said while praying or prostrating himself: "O Allah ! place light in my heart, light in my hearing, light in my sight, light on my right, light on my left, light in front of me, light behind me, light above me, light below me, make light for me," or he said: "Make me light."
[1678]
Salama said: I met Kuraib and he reported Ibn 'Abbas as saying: I was with my mother's sister Maimuna that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came there, and then he narrated the rest of the hadith as was narrated by Ghundar and said these words: "Make me light," beyond any doubt.
[1679]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: I spent a night in the house of my mother's sister, Maimuna, and then narrated (the rest of the) haditb, but he made no mention of the washing of his face and two hands but he only said: He then came to the water-skin and loosened its straps and performed ablution between the two extremes, and then came to his bed and slept. He then got up for the second time and came to the waterskin and loosened its straps and then performed ablution which was in fact an ablution (it was performed well), and implored (the Lord) thus: "Give me abundant light," and he made no raention of: "Make me light."
[1680]
Kuraib reported that Ibn 'Abbas spent a night in the house of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said: The Messenger of Allah may peace be upon him) stood near the water-skin and poured water out of that and performed ablution in which he neither used excess of water nor too little of it, and the rest of the hadith is the same, and in this mention is also made (of the fact) that on that night the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) made supplication before Allah in nineteen words. Kuraib reported: I remember twelve words out of these, bux have forgotten the rest. The Messenger of Allah said: "Place light in my heart, light in my tongue, light in my hearing, light in my sight, light above me, light below me, light on my right, light on my left, light in front of me, light behind me, place light in my soul, and make light abundant for me."
[1681]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: I slept one night in the house of Maimuna when the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was there, with a view to seeing the prayer of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) at night. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) entered into conversation with his wife for a short while, and then went to sleep, and the rest of the hadith is the same and in it mention is made of: "He then got up, performed ablution and brushed his teeth."
[1682]
'Abdullah b. 'Abbas reported: He spent (one night) in the house of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He (the Holy Prophet) got up, brushed his teeth and performed ablution and said: "In the creation of the heavens and the earth, and the alternation of the night and the day, there are indeed signs for people of understanding" (al-Qur'an, iii. 190), to the end of the Surah. He then stood up and prayed two rak'ahs, standing, bowing and prostrating himself at length in them. Then he finished, went to sleep and snored. He did that three times, six rak'ahs altogether, each time cleaning his teeth, performing ablution, and reciting these verses. Then he observed three rak'ahs of Witr. The Mu'adhdhin then pronounced the Adhan and he went out for prayer and was saying,: "O Allah I place light in my heart, light in my tongue, place light in my hearing, place light in my eyesight, place light behind me, and light in front of me, and place light above me, and light below me. O Allah ! grant me light."
[1683]
Ibn Abbas reported: I spent a night in the house of my mother's sister Maimuna. The Apostle of Allah (way peace be upon him) got up for observing voluntary prayer (Tahajjud) at night. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood by the water-skin and performed ablution and then stood up and prayed. I also got up when I saw him doing that. I also performed ablution from the water-skin and then stood at his left side. He took hold of my hand from behind his back and then turned me from his back to his right side. I ('Ata', one of the narrators) said: Did it concern the voluntary prayer (at night)? He ('Ibn 'Abbas) said: Yes.
[1684]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: (My father) Abbas sent me to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he was in the house of my mother's sister Maimuna and spent that night along with him. He (the Holy Prophet) got up and prayed at night, and I stood up on his left side. He caught hold of me from behind his back and made me stand on his right side.
[1685]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: I spent a night in the house of my mother's sister Maimuna, and the rest of the hadith is the same as narrated above.
[1686]
Abu Jamra reported : I heard Ibn 'Abbas saying that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed thirteen rak'ahs at night.
[1687]
Zaid b Khalid al-Juhani said: I would definitely watch at night the prayer observed by the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He prayed two short rak'ahs, then two long, long, long rak'ahs, then he prayed two rak'ahs which were shorter than the two preceding rak'ahs, then he prayed two rak'ahs which were shorter than the two preceding, then he prayed two rak'ahs which were shorter than the two preceding, then observed a single one (Witr), making a total of thirteen rak'ahs
[1688]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: I accompanied the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in a journey and we reached a watering place. He said: Jabir, are you going to enter it? I said: Yes. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then got down and I entered it. He (the Holy Prophet) then went away to relieve himself and I placed for him water for ablution. He then came back and performed ablution, and then stood and prayed in one garment, having its ends tied from the opposite sides. I stood.behind him and he caught hold of my ear and made me stand on his right side.
[1689]
'A'isha reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up at night to pray, he began his prayer with two short rak'ahs.
[1690]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying When any one of you gets up at night, he should begin the prayer with two short rak'ahs.
[1691]
Ibn Abbas reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) got up during the night to pray, he used to say: O Allah, to Thee be the praise Thou art the light of the heavens and the earth. To Thee be the praise; Thou art the Supporter of the heavens and the earth. To Thee be the praise; Thou art the Lord of the heavens and the earth and whatever is therein. Thou art the Truth; Thy promise is True, the meeting with Thee is True. Paradise is true, Hell is true, the Hour is true. O Allah, I submit to Thee; affirm my faith in Thee; repose my trust in Thee, and I reurn to Thee for repentance; by Thy help I have disputed; and to Thee I have come for decision, so forgive me my earlier and later sins, the sins that I committed in secret and openly. Thou art my God. There is no god but Thee.
[1692]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas through another chain of transmitters and with slight alteration of two words. Instead of the word Qayyam (Supporter, as used in the above hadith here the word) Qayyim (the Custodian) has been used, and he (further said): "What I did in secret." And in the hadith narrated by Ibn 'Uyaina there is some addition.
[1693]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn 'Abbas by another chain of transmitters and the words are nearly the same (as recorded in the above-mentioned hadith).
[1694]
'Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf reported: I asked 'A'isha, the mother of the believers, (to tell me) the words with which the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) commenced the prayer when he got up at night. She said: When he got up at night he would commence his prayer with these words: O Allah, Lord of Gabriel, and Michael, and Israfil, the Creator of the heavens and the earth, Who knowest the unseen and the seen; Thou decidest amongst Thy servants concerning their differences. Guide me with Thy permission in the divergent views (which the people) hold about Truth, for it is Thou Who guidest whom Thou wilt to the Straight Path.
[1695]
'Ali b. Abu Talib reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) got up at night for prayer he would say: I turn my face in complete devotion to One Who is the Originator of the heaven and the earth and I am not of the polytheists. Verily my prayer, my sacrifice, my living and my dying are for Allah, the Lord of the worlds; There is no partner with Him and this is what I have been commanded (to profess and believe) and I am of the believers. O Allah, Thou art the King, there is no god but Thee, Thou art my Lord, and I am Thy bondman. I wronged myself and make a confession of my Sin. Forgive all my sins, for no one forgives the sins but Thee, and guide me in the best of conduct for none but Thee guideth anyone (in) good conduct. Remove sins from me, for none else but Thou can remove sins from me. Here I am at Thy service, and Grace is to Thee and the whole of good is in Thine hand, and one cannot get nearneststo Thee through evil. My (power as well as existence) is due to Thee (Thine grace) and I turn to Thee (for supplication). Thou art blessed and Thou art exalted. I seek forgiveness from Thee and turn to Thee in repentance: and when he would bow, he would say: O Allah, it is for Thee that I bowed. I affirm my faith in Thee and I submit to Thee, and submit humbly before Thee my hearing, my eyesight, my marrow, my bone, my sinew; and when he would raise his head, he would say: O Allah, our Lord, praise is due to Thee, (the praise) with which is filled the heavens and the earth, and with which is filled that (space) which exists between them, and filled with anything that Thou desireth afterward. And when he prostrated himself, he (the Holy Prophet) would say: O Allah, it is to Thee that I prostrate myself and it is in Thee that I affirm my faith, and I submit to Thee. My face is submitted before One Who created it, and shaped it, and opened his faculties of hearing and seeing. Blessed is Allah, the best of Creators; and he would then say between Tashahhud and the pronouncing of salutation: Forgive me of the earlier and later open and secret (sins) and that where I made transgression and that Thou knowest better than I. Thou art the First and the Last. There is no god, but Thee.
[1696]
A'raj reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) would start the prayer, he would pronounce takbir (Allah-o-Akbar) and then say: I turn my face (up to Thee), I am the first of the believers; and when he raised his head from ruku' he said: Allah listened to him who praised Him; O our Lord, praise be to Thee; and he said: He shaped (man) and how fine is his shape? And he (the narrator) said: When he pronounced salutation he said: O Allah, forgive me my ear- lier (sins), to the end of the hadith; and he did not say it between the Tashahhud and salutation (as mentioned above).
[1697]
Hudhaifa reported: I prayed with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) one night and he started reciting al-Baqara. I thought that he would bow at the end of one hundred verses, but he proceeded on; I then thought that he would perhaps recite the whole (surah) in a rak'ah, but he proceeded and I thought he would perhaps bow on completing (this surah). He then started al-Nisa', and recited it; he then started Al-i-'Imran and recited leisurely. And when he recited the verses which referred to the Glory of Allah, he glorified (by saying Subhan Allah-Glory to my Lord the Great), and when he recited the verses which tell (how the Lord) is to be begged, he (the Holy Prophet) would then beg (from Him), and when he recited the verses dealing with protection from the Lord, he sought (His) protection and would then bow and say: Glory be to my Mighty Lord; his bowing lasted about the same length of time as his standing (and then on returning to the standing posture after ruku') he would say: Allah listened to him who praised Him, and he would then stand about the same length of time as he had spent in bowing. He would then prostrate himself and say: Glory be to my Lord most High, and his prostration lasted nearly the same length of time as his standing. In the hadith transmitted by Jarir the words are: "He (the Holy Prophet) would say: "Allah listened to him who praised Him, our Lord, to Thee i the praise."
[1698]
'Abdullah reported: I prayed with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he lengthened it till I entertained an evil thought. It was said to him what that thought was. He said: I thought that I should sit down and forsake him.
[1699]
A hadith like this has been narrated by A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[1700]
'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported that a mention was made of a man who slept the whole night till morning. He (the Holy Prophet) remarked: That is a man in whose ears (or in whose ear) the devil urinated.
[1701]
Husain b. 'Ali narrated on the authority of (his father) 'Ali b. Abu Talib that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) came one night to see him ('Ali) and Fatimah (the daughter of the Holy Prophet) and said: Don't you observe (Tahajjud) prayer? I ('Ali) said: Messenger of Allah, verily our souls are in the hands of Allah and when He wants to awaken us, He awakens us. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went back when I said this to him . He was striking his hand on his thigh while returning, and I heard him say: Verily the man disputes with many things.
[1702]
Abu Huraira transmitted it from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him): When any one of you goes to sleep, the devil ties three knots at the back of his neck, sealing every knot with: "You have a long night, so sleep." So if one awakes and mentions Allah, a knot will be loosened; if he performs ablution two knots are loosened; and if he prays (all) knots will be loosened, and in the morning he will be active and in good spirits; otherwise we will be in bad spirits and sluggish in the morning.
[1703]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Observe some of your prayers in your houses and do not make them graves.
[1704]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Pray in your houses, and do not make them graves.
[1705]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you observes prayer in the mosque he should reserve a part of his prayer for his house, for Allah would make the prayer as a means of betterment in his house.
[1706]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The house in which remembrance of Allah is made and the house in which Allah is not remembered are like the living and the dead.
[1707]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not make your houses as graveyards. Satan runs away from the house in which Surah Baqara is recited.
[1708]
Zaid b. Thabit reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) made an apartment with the help of the leaves of date trees or of mats. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out to pray in it. People followed him and came to pray with him. Then they again came one night and waited (for him), but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) delayed in coming out to them. And when he did not come out, they cried aloud and threw pebbles at the door. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out in anger and said to them: By what you have been constantly doing, I was inclined to think that it (prayer) might not become obligatory for you. So you must observe prayer (optional) in your houses, for the prayer observed by a man in the house is better except an obligatory prayer.
[1709]
Zaid b. Thabit reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) made an apartment in the mosque of mats, and he observed in it prayers for many nights till people began to gather around him, and the rest of the hadith is the same but with this addition: "Had this (Nafl) prayer become obligatory for you, you would not be able to observe it."
[1710]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had a mat and he used it for making an apartment during the night and observed prayer in it, and the people began to pray with him, and he spread it (the mat) during the day time. The people crowded round him one night. He (the Holy Prophet) then Eaid: O people, perform such acts as you are capable of doing, for Allah does not grow weary but you will get tired. The acts most pleasing to Allah are those which are done continuously, even if they are small. And it was the habit of the members of Muhammad's (may peace be upon him) household that whenever they did an act they did it continuously.
[1711]
'A'isha is reported to have said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was asked about the act most pleasing to Allah. He replied: That which is done continuously, even if it is small.
[1712]
Alqama reported: I asked 'A'isha, the mother of the believers, saying O mother of the believers, how did the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) act? Did he choose a particular act for a particular day? She said: No. He act was continuous, and who amongst you is capable of doing what the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did?
[1713]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The acts most pleasing to Allah are those which are done continuously, even if they are small. and when 'A'isha did any act she did it continuously.
[1714]
Anas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) entered the mosque (and he found) a rope tied between the two pillars; so he said: What is this? They said: It is for Zainab. She prays and when she slackens or feels tired she holds it. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: Untie it. Let one pray as long as one feels fresh but when one slackens or becomes tired one must stop it. (And in the hadith transmitted by Zuhair it is: "He should sit down.")
[1715]
A hadith like this has been narrated from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the authority of Anas by another chain of transmitters.
[1716]
'Urwa b. Zubair reported that 'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), told him that (once) Haula' dint Tuwait b. Habib b. Asad b. 'Abd al-'Uzzi passed by her (at the time) when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was with her. I ('A'Isha) said: It Is Haula' bint Tuwait and they say that she does not sleep at night. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: (Oh) she does not sleep at night ! Choose an act which you are capable of doing (continuously). By Allah, Allah would not grow weary, but you will grow weary.
[1717]
'A'isha said: The Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) came to me when a woman was sitting with me. He said: Who is she? I said: She is a woman who does not sleep but prays. He said: Do such acts which you are capable of doing. By Allah, Allah does not grow weary but you will grow weary. The religious act most pleasing to Him is one the doer of which does it continuously. (And in the hadith transmitted by Abu Usama [the words are]: "She was a woman from Banu Asad.")
[1718]
'A'isha reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: When anyone amongst you dozes in prayer, he should sleep, till sleep is gone, for when one of you prays while dozing he does not know whether he may be asking pardon or vilifying himself.
[1719]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you gets up at night (for prayer) and his tongue falters in (the recitation) of the Qar'an, and he does not know what he is reciting, he should go to sleep.
[1720]
'A'isha reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) heard a person reciting the Qur'an at night. Upon this he said: May Allah show mercy to him; he has reminded me of such and such a verse which I had missed in such and such a surah.
[1721]
'A'isha reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) listened to the recitation of the Qur'an by a man in the mosque. Thereupon he said: May Allah have mercy upon him; be reminded me of the verse which I had been made to forget.
[1722]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The example of a man who has memorised the Qur'an is like that of a hobbled camel. If he remained vigilant, he would be able to retain it (with him), and if he loosened the hobbled camel it would escape.
[1723]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn 'Umar from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), but in the hadith transmited by Musa b. 'Uqba, this addition is made: "When one who had committed the Qur'an to memory(or who is familiar with it) gets up (for night prayer) and recites it night and day, it remains fresh in his mind, but if he does not get up (for prayer and thus does not recite it) he forgets it."
[1724]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: What a wretched person is he amongst them who says: I have forgotten such and such a verse. (He should instead of using this expression say): I have been made to forget it. Try to remember the Qur'an for it is more apt to escape from men's minds than a hobbled camel.
[1725]
'Abdullah is reported to have said: Keep refreshing your knowledge of the sacred books (or always renew your knowledge of these sacred books) and sometimes he would mention the Qur'an for it is more apt to escape from men's minds than animals which are hobbled, and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: None of you should say: I forgot such and such a verse, but he has been made to forget.
[1726]
Ibn Mas'ud reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Wretched is the man who says: I forgot such and such a sura, or I forget such and such a verse, but he has been made to forget.
[1727]
Abu Musa al-Ash'ari reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Keep refreshing your knowledge of the Qur'an, for I swear by Him in Whose Hand is the life of Mahammad that it is more liable to escape than camels which are hobbled.
[1728]
Abu Huraira reported this directly from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him): God has not listened to anything as He listens to a Prophet reciting the Qur'an in a sweet voice.
[1729]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn Shihab with the same chain of transmitters with words: "As He listens to a Prophet reciting the Qur'an in a sweet voice."
[1730]
Abu Huraira is reported to have heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah does not listen to anything, (more approvingly) as He listens to a Prophet reciting loudly the Qur'an in a sweet voice.
[1731]
This hadith has been narrated with the same chain of transmitters by Ibn al-Had except this that Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying and he did not say: "He heard it."
[1732]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah has not heard anything (more pleasing) than listening to the Prophet reciting the Qur'an in a sweet loud voice.
[1733]
This hadith has been narrated by another chain of transmitters but with a slight modification of words.
[1734]
Buraida reported on the authority of his father that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: 'Abdullah b. Qais or al-Ash'ari has been gifted with a sweet melodious voice out of the voices of the family of David.
[1735]
Abu Burda narrated on the authority of Abu Musa that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said to Abu Musa: If you were to see me, as I was listening to your recitation (of the Qur'an) yester-night (you would have felt delighted). You are in fact endowed with a sweet voice like that of David himself.
[1736]
Mu'awiya b. Qurra reported 'Abdullah b. Mughaffal al-Muzani as saying: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited on his ride Surat al Fath during a journey in the year of the Conquest (of Mecca), and he repeated(the words) in his recitation. Mu'awiya said: If I were not afraid that the people would crowd around me, I would have given a demonstration of (the Prophet's) recitation before you.
[1737]
Mu'awiya b. Qurra is reported to have heard 'Abdullah b. Mughaffal as saying: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) reciting Surah Fath on his camel on the day of the Conquest of Mecca. He (the narrator) said: Ibn Mughaffal recited it and repeated it. Mu'awiya said: Had there been (no crowed of) people, I would have given a practical demonstration of that which Ibn Mughaffal had mentioned from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[1738]
This hadlth has been narrated by Khalid al-Harith with the same chain of transmitters (with these words:) (The Holy Prophet) was reciting Surat al-Fath as he was travelling on his mount.
[1739]
Al-Bara' reported that a person was reciting Surat al-Kahf and there was a horse tied with two ropes at his side, a cloud overshadowed him, and as it began to come nearer and nearer his horse began to take fright from it. He went and mentioned that to the Prophet (may peace be upon him) in the morning, and he (the Holy Prophet) said: That was tranquillity which came down at the recitation of the Qur'an.
[1740]
Ibn Ishaq reported: I heard al-Bara' as saying that a man recited al-Kahf when an animal was there in the house and it began to take fright. And as he looked around, he found a cloud overshadowing it. He mentioned that to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). Upon this he said: O so and so, recite on (the surah) as- Sakina descends at the (recitation of the Qur'an) or on account (of the recitation) of the Qur'an.
[1741]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of al-Bara' with a slight modification of words.
[1742]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri told of Usaid b. Hudair saying that one night he recited the Qur'an in his enclosure, when the horse began to jump about. He again recited and (the horse) again jumped. He again recited and it jumped as before. Usaid said: I was afraid lest it should trample (his son) Yahya. I stood near it (the horse) and saw something like a canopy over my head with what seemed to be lamps in it, rising up in the sky till it disappeared. I went to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the next day and said: Messenger of Allah, I recited the Qur'an during the night in my enclosure and my horse began to jump. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: You should have kept on reciting, Ibn Hudair. He (Ibn Hudair) said: I recited. It jumped (as before). Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) again said: You should have kept on reciting, Ibn Hudair. He (Ibn Hudair) said: I recited and it again jumped (as before). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) again said: You should kave kept on reciting, Ibu Hudair. He (Ibn Hudair) said: (Messenger of Allah) I finished (the recitation) for Yahya was near (the horse) and I was afraid lest it should trample him. I saw something like a canopy with what seemed to be lamps in it rising up in the sky till it disappeared. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Those were the angels who listened to you; and if you had continued reciting, the people would have seen them in the morning and they would not have concealed themselves from them.
[1743]
Abu Musa al-Ash'ari reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A believer who recites the Qur'an is like an orange whose fragrance is sweet and whose taste is sweet; a believer who does not recite the Qur'an is like a date which has no fragrance but has a sweet taste; and the hypocrite who recites the Qur'an is like a basil whose fragrance is sweet, but whose taste is bitter; and a hypocrite who does not recite the Qur'an is like the colocynth which has no fragrance and has a bitter taste.
[1744]
This hadith has been narrated by Qatada with the same chain of transmitters but with one alteration that instead of the word: "hypocrite" (Munafiq), there it is "wicked" (fajir).
[1745]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (as saying): One who is proficient in the Qur'an is associated with the noble, upright, recording angels; and he who falters in it, and finds it difficult for him, will have a double reward.
[1746]
This hadith has been reported with the same chain of transmitters by Qatada except with this change: "He who finds it hard (to recite the Qur'an) will have a double reward."
[1747]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying to Ubayy b. Ka'b: Allah has commanded me to recite the Qur'an to you. He said: Did Allah mention me to you by name? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Allah made a mention of your name to me. (On hearing this) Ubayy b. Ka'b wept.
[1748]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying to Ubayy b. Ka'b: Aliah has commanded me to recite to you: "Those who disbelieve were not.. ." (al-Qur'an, xcviii. 1). He said: Did He mention me by name? He (the Holy Prophet said): Yes. Upon this he shed tears (of gratitude).
[1749]
Qatada said: I heard Anas saying that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to Ubayy the same thing.
[1750]
'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon (him) asked me to recite the Qur'an. He said: Messenger of Allah, (how) should I recite to you whereas it has been sent down to you? He (the Holy Prophet) said: I desire to hear it from someone else. So I recited Surat al-Nisa' till I reached the verse: How then shall it be when We shall bring from every people a witness and bring you against them as a witness?" (verse 41). I lifted my head or a person touched me in my side, and so I lifted my head and saw his tears falling (from the Holy Prophet's eyes).
[1751]
This hadith has been narratted by A'mash with the same chain of transmitters but with this addition: "The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was on the pulpit when he asked me to recite to him."
[1752]
Ibrahim reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) asked 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud to recite to him (the Qur'an). He said: Should I recite it to you while it has been sent down or revealed to you? He (the Holy Prophet) said: I love to hear it from someone else. So he ('Abdullah b. Mas'ud) recited to him (from the beginning of Surat al Nisa' up to the verse: " How shall then it be when We bring from every people a witness and bring you as a witness against them?" He (the Holy Prophet) wept (on listening to it). It is narrated on the authority of Ibn Mas'ud through another chain of transmitters that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) also said that he had been a witness to his people as long as (said he) : I lived among them or I had been among them.
[1753]
'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported: I was in Hims when some of the people asked me to recite the Qur'an to them. So I recited Surah Yusuf to them. One of the persons among the people said: By Allah, this is not how it has been sent down. I said: Woe upon you ! By Allah, I recited it to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said to me: You have (recited) it well. I was talking with him (the man who objected to my recitation) that I sensed the smell of wine from him. So I said to him . Do you drink wine and belie the Book (of Allah)? You would not depart till I would whip you. So I lashed him according to the prescribed punishment (for the offence of drinking wine).
[1754]
This hadith has been narrated by A'mash with the same chain of transmitters but with an exception that it is not mentioned in it: "He said to me: You recited (the Qur'an) well."
[1755]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Would any one of you like, when he returns to his family, to find there three large, fat, pregnant she-camels? We said: Yes. Upon this he said: Three verses that one of you recites in his prayer are better for him than three large, fat, pregnant she-camels.
[1756]
'Uqba b. 'Amir reported: When we were in Suffa, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out and said: Which of you would like to go out every morning to Buthan or al-'Aqiq and bring two large she-camels without being guilty of sin or without severing the ties of kinship? We said: Messenger of Allah, we would like to do it. Upon this he said: Does not one of you go out in the morning to the mosque and teach or recite two verses from the Book of Allah. the Majestic and Glorious? That is better for him than two she-camels, and three verses are better (than three she-camels).and four verses are better for him than four (she-camels), and to on their number in camels.
[1757]
Abu Umama said he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: Recite the Qur'an, for on the Day of Resurrection it will come as an intercessor for those who recite It. Recite the two bright ones, al-Baqara and Surah Al 'Imran, for on the Day of Resurrection they will come as two clouds or two shades, or two flocks of birds in ranks, pleading for those who recite them. Recite Surah al-Baqara, for to take recourse to it is a blessing and to give it up is a cause of grief, and the magicians cannot confront it. (Mu'awiya said: It has been conveyed to me that here Batala means magicians.)
[1758]
This hadith has been narrated by Mu'awiya with the same chain of transmitters but with this exception that in this the words of Mu'awiya: "It has been conveyed to me.. . " have not been mentioned.
[1759]
An-Nawwas b. Sam'an said he heard the Apostle (may peace be upon him) say: On the Day of Resurrection the Qur'an and those who acted according to it will be brought with Surah al-Baqara and AI 'Imran preceding them. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) likened them to three things, which I did not forget afterwards. He (the Holy Prophet) likened them to two clouds, or two black canopies with light between them, or like two flocks of birds in ranks pleading for one who recited them.
[1760]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that while Gabriel was sitting with the Apostle (may peace be upon him) he heard a creaking sound above him. He lifted his head and said: This As a gate opened in heaven today which had never been opened before. Then when an angel descended through it, he said: This is an angel who came down to the earth who had-never come down before. He greeted and said: Rejoice in two lights given to you which have not been given to any prophet before you: Falihat al-Kitab and the concluding verses of Suarah al-Baqara. You will never recite a letter from them for which you will not be given (a reward).
[1761]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Yazid reported: I met Abu Mas'ud near the House (Ka'ba) and said to him: A hadith has been conveyed to me on your authority about the two (concluding verses of Surah al-Baqara. He said: Yes. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (in fact) said: Anyone who recites the two verses at the end of Surah al-Baqara at night, they would suffice for him.
[1762]
This hadith has been narrated by Mansur with the same chain of transmitters.
[1763]
Abu Mas'ud reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If anyone recites the two verses at the end of Surah al-Baqara at night, they would suffice for him 'Abd al-Rahman said: I met Abu Mas'ud and he was circumambulating the House (of Allah) and asked him about this (tradition) and he narrated it to me from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[1764]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Abu Mas'ud from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) through another chain of transmitters.
[1765]
It is through another chain of transmitters that this hadith has been reported by Abu Mas'ud from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[1766]
Abu Darda' reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: If anyone learns by heart the first ten verses of the Surah al-Kahf, he will be protected from the Dajjal.
[1767]
This hadith has been transmitted by Qatada with the same chain of transmitters. But Shu'ba (one of the narrators) said: At the end of Surah al-Kahf, but Hammam said: At the beginning of Surah al-Kahf.
[1768]
Ubayy b. Ka'b said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: O Abu' al-Mundhir, do you know the verse from the Book of Allah which, according to you, is the greatest? I said: Allah and His Apostle (may peace be upon him) know best. He again said: Abu'l-Mundhir, do you know the verse from the Book of Allah which, according to you, is the greatest? I said: Allah, there is no god but He, the Living, the Eternal. Thereupon he struck me on my breast and said: May knowledge be pleasant for you, O Abu'l-Mundhir!
[1769]
Abu Darda' reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Is any one of you incapable of reciting a third of the Qur'an in a night? They (the Companions) asked: How could one recite a third of the Qur'an (in a night)? Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: "He is Allah, One" (Qur'An. cxii.) is equivalent to a third of the Qur'an.
[1770]
This hadith has been narrated by Qatada with the same chain of transmitters in these words: He (the Apostle of Allah) said: Allah divided the Qur'an into three parts, and he made: "Say: He, Allah is One." one part out of the (three) parts of the Qur'an.
[1771]
It is reported on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Get together. for I am going to recite one-third of the Qur'an before you. And those who could get together gathered there. Then the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out and recited: "Say: He, Allah, is One." He then entered (his house). Some of us said to the others: Perhaps there has been some news from the heaven on account of which he has gone Inside (the house). The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) again came out and said: I told you that I was going to recite one-third of the Qur'in; keep in mind, this (Surah Ikhlas) is equivalent to one-third of the Qur'an.
[1772]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out to us and said: I am going to recite before you one-third of the Qur'an. He (the Holy Prophet) then recited: "Say: He is Allah, One--Allah, the Eternal," to the end of the Surah.
[1773]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent a man in charge of an expedition and he would recite for his Companions during their prayer, ending (recitation) with: "Say, He is God, One." When they returned mention was made of it to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He (the Holy Prophet) told them to ask him why he had done like that. So they asked him and he said: Verily, it is an attribute of the Compassionate One, and (for this reason) I love to recite it. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) thereupon said: Inform him that Allah loves him.
[1774]
'Uqba b. 'Amir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: What wonderful verses have been sent down today. the like of which has never been seen ! They are: "Say: I seek refuge with the Lord of the dawn," and "Say: I seek refuge with the Lord of men."
[1775]
'Uqba b. 'Amir reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to me: There have been sent down to me verses the like of which had never been seen before. They are the Mu'awwadhatain.
[1776]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters directly from the Companions of Muhammad (may peace be upon him).
[1777]
Salim narrated on the authority of his father (Ibn 'Umar) that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Envy is not justified but in case of two persons only: one who, having been given (knowledge of) the Qur'an by Allah, recites it during the night and day (and also acts upon it) and a man who, having been given wealth by God, spends it during the night and the day (for the welfare of others. seeking the pleasure of the Lord).
[1778]
Salim son of Abdullah b. 'Umar is reported to have said on the authority of his father that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed : Envy is not justified but in case of two persons only: one who, having been given (knowledge of) the Qur'an by Allah, recites it during the night and during the day (and acts upon it), and the person who, having been given wealth by God, gives it in charity during the night and the day.
[1779]
'Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There should be no envy but only in case of two persons: one having been endowed with wealth and power to spend it in the cause of Truth, and (the other) who has been endowed with wisdom and he decides cases with the help of it and teaches it (to others).
[1780]
'Amir b. Wathila reported that Nafi' b. 'Abd al-Harith met 'Umar at 'Usfan and 'Umar had employed him as collector in Mecca. He (Hadrat 'Umar) said to him (Nafi'): Whom have you appointed as collector over the people of the valley? He said: Ibn Abza. He said: Who is Ibn Abza? He said: He is one of our freed slaves. He (Hadrat 'Umar) said: So you have appointed a freed slave over them. He said: He is well versed In the Book of Allah. the Exalted and Great, and he is well versed In the commandments and injunctions (of the Shari'ah). 'Umar said: So the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: By this Book, Allah would exalt some peoples and degrade others.
[1781]
This hadith has been narrated by Zuhri through another chain of transmitters.
[1782]
'Umar b. Khattab said: I heard Hisham b. Hakim b. Hizam reciting Surah al-Furqan in a style different from that in which I used to recite it, and in which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had taught me to recite it. I was about to dispute with him (on this style) but I delayed till he had finished that (the recitation). Then I caught hold of his cloak and brought him to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, I heard this man reciting Surah al-Furqan in a style different from the one in which you taught me to recite. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) told (me) to leave him alone and asked him to recite. He then recited in the style in which I beard him recite it. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then said: Thus was it sent down. He then told me to recite and I recited it, and he said: Thus was it sent down. The Qur'an was sent down in seven dialects. So recite what seems easy therefrom.
[1783]
This hadith has been transmitted thus by 'Umar b. Khattab (with a slight change of words): "I heard Hisham b. Hakim reciting Surah al-Furqan during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)." The rest is the same but with this addition: "I was about to catch hold of him in prayer, but I exercised patience till he pronounced salutation.
[1784]
This hadith has been transmitted by Zuhri.
[1785]
Ibn 'Abbas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Gabriel taught me to recite in one style. I replied to him and kept asking him to give more (styles), till he reached seven modes (of recitation). Ibn Shibab said: It has reached me that these seven styles are essentially one, not differing about what is permitted and what is forbidden.
[1786]
This hadith has been narrated by Zuhri with the same chain of trans- mitters.
[1787]
Ubayy b. Ka'b reported: I was in the mosque when a man entered and prayed and recited (the Qur'in) in a style to which I objected. Then another man entered (the mosque) and recited in a style different from that of his companion. When we had finished the prayer, we all went to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said to him: This man recited in a style to which I objected, and the other entered and recited in a style different from that of his companion. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) asked them to recite and so they recited, and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) expressed approval of their affairs (their modes of recitation). and there occurred In my mind a sort of denial which did not occur even during the Days of Ignorance. When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saw how I was affected (by a wrong idea), he struck my chest, whereupon I broke into sweating and felt as though I were looking at Allah with fear. He (the Holy Prophet) said to me: Ubayy. a message was sent to me to recite the Qur'an in one dialect, and I replied: Make (things) easy for my people.It was conveyed to me for the second time that it should be recited in two dialects. I again replied to him: Make affairs easy for my people. It was again conveyed to me for the third time to recite in seven dialects And (I was further told) : You have got a seeking for every reply that I sent you, which you should seek from Me. I said: O Allah ! forgive my people, forgive my people, and I have deferred the third one for the day on which the entire creation will turn to me, including even Ibrahim (peace be upon him) (for intercession).
[1788]
Ubayy b. Ka'b reported that he was sitting in a mosque that a person entered it and he observed prayer, and made recitation, the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1789]
Ubayy b. Ka'b reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was near the tank of Banu Ghifar that Gabriel came to him and said: Allah has commanded you to recite to your people the Qur'an in one dialect. Upon this he said: I ask from Allah pardon and forgiveness. My people are not capable of doing it. He then came for the second time and said: Allah has commanded you that you should recite the Qur'an to your people in two dialects. Upon this he (the Holy prophet) again said: I seek pardon and forgiveness from Allah, my people would not be able to do so. He (Gabriel) came for the third time and said: Allah has commanded you to recite the Qur'an to your people in three dialects. Upon this he said: I ask pardon and forgiveness from Allah. My people would not be able to do it. He then came to him for the fourth time and said: Allah has commanded you to recite the Qur'an to your people in seven dialects, and in whichever dialect they would recite, they would be right.
[1790]
This hadith has been narrated by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[1791]
Abu Wa'il reported that a person named Nabik b. Sinan came to Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) and said: Abu 'Abd al-Rahman, how do you recite this word (alif) or (ya)? Would you read It as: min ma'in ghaira asin or au min ma'in ghaira ghaira yasin.(al-Qur'an, xlvii. 15) ?'Abdullah said: You (seem to) have memorised the whole of the Qur'an except this. He (again) said:I recite all the mufassal surahs in one rak'ah. Upon this 'Abdullah said: (You must have been reciting It) hastily like the recitation of poetry. Verily. there are people who recite the Qur'an, but it does not go down beyond their collar bones. It is (a fact with the Qur'an) that it is beneficial only when it settles in the heart and is rooted deeply in it. The best of (the acts) in prayer are bowing and prostration. I am quite aware of the occasions when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) combined together two surahs in every rak'ah. 'Abdullah then stood up and went out with 'Alqama following in his footstep. He said Ibn Numair had told him that the narration was like that: "A person belonging to Banu Bajila came to 'Abdullah," and he did not mention (the name of) Nahik b. Sinan.
[1792]
Abu Wa'il reported: A person came to 'Abdullah, who was called Nahik b. Sinan, and the rest of the hadith is the same but for this: " Alqama came to him ('Abdullah b. Mas'ud) and we said to him: Ask him about the manners in which he combined (two surahs) in one rak'ah. So he went to him and asked him and then came to us and said: Twenty are the mufassal surahs in the compilation (of the Qur'an) made by 'Abdullah."
[1793]
This hadith has been narrated by A'mash with the same chain of transmitters in which ('Abdullah b. Mas'ud) said: "I know the manners in which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited the two surahs in one rak'ah and then twenty surahs in ten rak'ahs."
[1794]
Abu Wa'il reported: One day we went to 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud after we had observed the dawn prayer and we paid salutation at the door. He permitted us to enter, but we stayed for a while at the door, when the slave-girl came out and said: Why don't you come in? So we went in and (we found 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud) sitting and glorifying Allah (i.e. he was busy in dhikr) and he said: What obstructed you from coming in though you had been granted permission for it? We said: There was nothing (behind it) but we entertained the idea that some inmate of the house might be sleeping. He said: Do you presume any idleness on the part of the family of Ibn Umm 'Abd (the mother of Abdullah b. Mas'ud)? He was again busy with the glorification of Allah till he thought that the sun had risen. He said: Girl, see whether (the sun) has arisen. She glanced but it had not risen (by that time). He was again busy with the glorification (of Allah) and he (again) thought that the sun had arisen. She glanced (and confirmed) that,it had risen. Upon this he ('Abdullah b. Mas'ud) said: Praise be to Allah Who did not call us to account for our sins today. Mahdi said: I think that he said, He did not destroy us for our sins. One among the people said: I recited all the mufassal surahs during the night. 'Abdullah said: (You must have recited them) like the (recitation) of poetry. I heard (the Holy Prophet) combining (the sarahs) and I remember the combinations which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) made In the recitation (of surahs). These were constituted of eighteen mufassal surahs and two surahs (commencing with) Ha-Mim.
[1795]
Shaqiq reported: A person from Banu Bajila who was called Nabik b. Sinan came to Abdullah and said: I recite mufassal surahs in one rak'ah. Upon this 'Abdullah said: (You recite) like the recitation of poetry. I know the manner in which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited two surahs in one rak'ah.
[1796]
Abu Wa'il reported: A person came to 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud and said: I recited all the mufassal surahs in one rak'ah during the night. 'Abdullah said: You must have recited hastily like the recitation of poetry. 'Abdullah said: I remember well the manner in which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to combine them, and he then mentioned twenty of the mufassal surahs, and (their combinations in) two in every rak'ah.
[1797]
Abu Ishaq reported: I saw a man asking Aswad b. Yazid who taught the Qur'an in the mosque: How do you recite the verse (fahal min muddakir) whether (the word muddakir) Is with (d) or (dh)? He (Aswad) said: It was with (d). I heard Abdullah b. Mas'ud saying that he had heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) reciting (muddakir) with (d).
[1798]
Ishaq is reported to have said on the authority of Aswad who quoted on the authority of 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite these words as (fahal min muddakir).
[1799]
'Alqama reported. We went to Syria and Abu Darda' came to us and said: Is there anyone among you who recites according to the recitation of Abdullah? I said: Yes, it is I. He again said: How did you hear 'Abdullah reciting this verse: (wa'l-lail-i-idha yaghsha - when the night covers)? He ('Alqama) said: I heard him reciting it (like this) (wa'l-lail-i-idha yaghsha) wa-dhakar wal untha - when the night covers and the males and the females). Upon this he said: By Allah, I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) reciting in this way, but they (the Muslims of Syria) desire us to recite: (wa ma khalaqa), but I do not yield to their desire.
[1800]
Ibrahim reported: 'Alqama came to Syria and entered the mosque and prayed there and then went to a (place where people were sitting in a) circle and he sat therein. Then a person came there and I perceived that the people were annoyed and perturbed (on this arrival). and he sat on my side and then said: Do you remember how 'Abdullah used to recite (the Qur'an)? And then the rest of the hadith was narrated.
[1801]
'Alqama reported: I met Abu Darda', and he said to me: To which country do you belong? I said: I am one of the people of Iraq. He again said: To which city? I replied: City of Kufa. He again said: Do you recite according to the recitation of 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud? I said: Yes. He said: Recite this verse (By the night when it covers) So I recited it: (By the night when it covers, and the day when it shines, and the creating of the male and the female). He laughed and said: I have heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) reciting like this.
[1802]
This hadith has been narrated by another chain of transmitters.
[1803]
Abu Huraira is reported to have said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prohibited to observe prayer after the 'Asr prayer till the sun is set, and after the dawn till the sun rises.
[1804]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: I heard it from so many Companions of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and one among them is 'Umar b. Khattab, and he is most dear to me among them that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prohibited observing of prayer after the dawn prayer till the sun rose and after the 'Asr till the sun set. This hadith has been narrated by Qatada with the same chain of transmitters with a minor alteration of words.
[1805]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No prayer is valid after the 'Asr prayer till the sun sets and no prayer is valid after the dawn prayer till the sun rises.
[1806]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Let not any one of you intend to observe prayer at the time of the rising of the sun or of the setting sun.
[1807]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not intend to observe prayer at the time of the rising of the sun nor at its setting, for it rises between the horns of Satan.
[1808]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When the rim of the sun starts appearing defer prayer till it completely appears, and when the rim of the sun disappears defer prayer till it completely disappears.
[1809]
Abu Basra Ghifari reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led us in the 'Asr prayer at (the place known as) Mukhammas, and then said: This prayer was presented to those gone before you, but they lost it, and he who guards it has two rewards in store for him. And no prayer is valid after till the onlooker appears (by onlooker is meant the evening star).
[1810]
This hadith has been narrated by Abu Basra Ghifari through another chain of transmitters.
[1811]
Uqba b. 'Amir said: There were the times at which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade us to pray, or bury our dead: When the sun begins to rise till it is fully up, when the sun is at its height at midday till it passes over the meridian, and when the sun draws near to setting till it sets.
[1812]
'Amr b. 'Abasa Sulami reported: I in the state of the Ignorance (before embracing Islam) used to think that the people were in error and they were not on anything (which may be called the right path) and worshipped the idols. In the meanwhile I heard of a man in Mecca who was giving news (on the basis of his prophetic knowledge); so I sat on my ride and went to him. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was at that time hiding as his people had made life hard for him. I adopted a friendly attitude (towards the Meccans and thus managed) to enter Mecca and go to him (the Holy Prophet) and I said to him: Who are you? He said: I am a Prophet (of Allah). I again said: Who is a Prophet? He said: (I am a Prophet in the sense that) I have been sent by Allah. I said: What is that which you have been sent with? He said: I have been sent to join ties of relationship (with kindness and affection), to break the Idols, and to proclaim the oneness of Allah (in a manner that) nothing is to be associated with Him. I said: Who is with you in this (in these beliefs and practices)? He said: A free man and a slave. He (the narrator) said: Abu Bakr and Bilal were there with him among those who had embraced Islam by that time. I said: I intend to follow you. He said: During these days you would not be able to do so. Don't you see the (hard) condition under which I and (my) people are living? You better go back to your people and when you hear that I have been granted victory, you come to me. So I went to my family. I was in my home when the Messengerof Allah (may peace be upon him)came to Medina. I was among my people and used to seek news and ask people when he arrived in Medina. Then a group of people belonging to Yathrib (Medina) came. I said (to them): How is that person getting on who has come to Medina? They said: The people are hastening to him, while his people (the polytheists of Mecca) planned to kill him, but they could not do so. I (on hearing It) came to Medina and went to him and said: Messenger of Allah, do you recognise me? He said: Yes, you are the same man who met me at Mecca. I said: It is so. I again said: Prophet of Allah, tell me that which Allah has taught you and which I do not know, tell me about the prayer. He said: Observe the dawn prayer, then stop praying when the sun is rising till it Is fully up, for when it rises it comes up between the horns of Satan, and the unbelievers prostrate themselves to it at that time. Then pray, for the prayer is witnessed and attended (by angels) till the shadow becomes about the length of a lance; then cease prayer, for at that time Hell is heated up. Then when the shadow moves forward, pray, for the prayer is witnessed and attended by angels, till you pray the afternoon prayer, then cease prayer till the sun sets, for it sets between the horns of devil, and at that time the unbelievers prostrate themselves before it. I said: Apostle of Allah, tell me about ablution also. He said: None of you who uses water for ablution and rinses his mouth, snuffs up water and blows it, but the sins of his face, and his mouth and his nostrils fall out. When he washes his face, as Allah has commanded him, the sins of his face fall out from the end of his beard with water. Then (when) he washes his forearms up to the elbows, the sins of his arms fall out along with water from his finger-tips. And when he wipes his head, the sins of his head fall out from the points of his hair along with water. And (when) he washes his feet up to the ankles, the sins of his feet fall out from his toes along with water. And if he stands to pray and praises Allah, lauds Him and glorifies Him with what becomes Him and shows wholehearted devotion to Allah, his sins would depart leaving him (as innocent) as he was on the day his mother bore him. 'Amr b. 'Abasa narrated this hadith to Abu Umama, a Companion of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and Abu Umama said to him: 'Amr b. 'Abasa, think what you are saying that such (a great reward) is given to a man at one place (only in the act of ablution and prayer). Upon this 'Amr said: Abu Umama, I have grown old and my bones have become weak and I am at the door of death; what impetus is there for me to attribute a lie to Allah and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)? Had I heard it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) once, twice, or three times (even seven times), I would have never narrated it, but I have heard it from him on occasions more than these.
[1813]
'A'isha reported that 'Umar misconstrued the fact that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had prohibited the observance of prayer at the time of the rising sun and at the time of its setting.
[1814]
'A'isha said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not abandon observing two rak'ahs after 'Asr, but she reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not get used to observe prayer at the time of the rising sun and at the time of its setting and (exhorted the Muslims) to pray at their times.
[1815]
Kuraib, the freed slave of Ibn 'Abbas, reported that 'Abdullah b. 'Abbas, 'Abd al-Rahman b. Azhar, al-Miswar b. Makhrama sent him to 'A'isha, the wife of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), telling him to give her their greetings, and ask her about the two rak'ahs after the afternoon prayer, (for) "we have heard that you observe them whereas it has been conveyed to us that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prohibited their observance." Ibn 'Abbas said: I along with 'Umar b. al-Khattab dissuaded people to do so (to observe two rak'ahs of prayer). Kuraib said: I went to her ('A'isha) and conveyed to her the message with which I was sent. She said: (Better) ask Umm Salama. So I went to them (those who had sent him to Hadrat 'A'isha) and informed them about what she had said. They sent me back to Umm Salama with that with which I was sent to 'A'isha. Umm Salama said: I beard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prohibiting them, and then afterwards I saw him observing them. And when he observed them (two rak'ahs) he had already observed the 'Asr prayer. Then he (the Holy Prophet) came, while there were with me ladies of Banu Haram, a tribe of the Ansar and he (the Holy Prophet) observed them (the two rak'ahs). I sent a slave-girl to him asking her to stand by his side and say to him that Umm Salama says: Messenger of Allah, I heard you prohibiting these two rak'ahs, whereas I saw you observing them; and if he (the Holy Prophet) points with his hand (to wait), then do wait. The slave-girl did like that. He (the Holy Prophet) pointed out with his hand and she got aside and waited, and when he had finished (the prayer) he said: Daughter of Abu Umayya. you have asked about the two rak'ahs after the 'Asr prayer. Some people of 'Abu al-Qais came to me for embracing Islam and hindered me from observing the two rak'ahs which come after the noon prayer. So those are the two I have been praying.
[1816]
Abu Salama asked 'A'isha about the two prostrations (i.e. rak'ahs) which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) made after the 'Asr. She said: He (the Holy Prophet) observed them before the 'Asr prayer, but then he was hindered to do so, or he forgot them and then he observed them after the 'Asr, and then he continued observing them. (It was his habit) that when he (the Holy Prophet) observed prayer, he then continued observing it. Isma'il said: It implies that he always did that.
[1817]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not abandon at all observing two rak'ahs after the 'Asr in my house.
[1818]
'A'isha reported: Two are the prayers which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) always observed in my house-openly or secretly-two rak'ahs before the dawn and two rak'ahs after the 'Asr.
[1819]
Aswad and Masruq reported: We bear testimony to the fact that 'A'isha said: Never was there a day that he (the Holy Prophet) was with me and he did not observe two rak'ahs of prayer in my house, i.e. two rak'ahs after the Asr.
[1820]
Mukhtar b. Fulful said: I asked Anas b. Malik about the voluntary prayers after the afternoon prayer, and he replied: 'Umar struck hit hands on prayer observed after the 'Asr prayer and we used to observe two rak'ahs after the sun set before the evening prayer during the time of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). I said to him: Did the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observe them? He said: He saw us observing them, but he neither commanded us nor forbade us to do so.
[1821]
Anas b. Malik reported: When we were in Medina, the moment the Mu'adhdhin made the call to the sunset prayer, the people hastened to the pillars of the mosque and prayed two rak'ahs with the result that any stranger coming into the mosque would think that the obligatory prayer had been observed owing to the number who were praying then.
[1822]
Abdullah b. Mughaffal reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) u saying: There Is between the two calls (Adhan and Iqama) a prayer. And he mentioned it three times, and at the third time he said: This applies to those who wish to do it.
[1823]
This hadith has been narrated by Abdullah b. Mughaffal by another chain of transmitters, but with this variation that he (the Holy Prophet) said at the fourth time: "He who wishes (may do to)."
[1824]
Salim b. Abdullah b. 'Umar reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) led on* of the two groups In one rak'ah of prayer in danger, while the other group faced the -enemy. Then they (the members of the first group) went back and replaced their companions who were facing the enemy. and then they (the members of the second group) came and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) led them in one rak'ah of prayer. Then the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) pronounced salutation, and then they (the members of the Ant group) completed the rak'ah and they (the members of the second group) completed the rak'ah. This hadith has been narrated by another chain of tranamitters.
[1825]
Ibn Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed prayer in danger on some day (in this way): a group stood with him (the Holy Prophet) (for prayer) and the other group stood In front of the enemy. Then those who were with (him) observed one rak'ah of prayer and they went back and the others came and they observed one rak'ah (with him). Then both the groups completed one rak'ah each. Ibn Umar said: When there is greater danger, then observe prayer even on the ride or with the help of gestures in a standing posture.
[1826]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: I observed prayer in danger with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). We drew ourselves up in two rows, one row behind him with the enemy between us and the Qibla. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Allah is Most Great, and we all said it. He then bowed and we all bowed. He then raised his head from bowing, we all raised (our heads). He then went down in prostration along with the row close to him, and the rear row faced the enemy; then when the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) completed the prostration,; and then stood up, the row near to him also did it; then went down the rear row in prostration; then they stood up; then the rear row went to the front and the front row went to the rear. Then the Apostle of Allah (may peace he upon him) bowed down and we all bowed. He then raised his head from bowing and we also raised (our heads). He and the row close to him which I had been in the rear then went down in prostration In the first rak'ah, whereas the rear row faced the enemy. And when the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and the rear row close to him had finished the prostration, the rear row went down and prostrated themselves; then the Apostle of Allah pronounced the salutation and we also pronounced the salutation. (Jabir said we hadith) as your guards behave with their chiefs.
[1827]
Jabir reported: We fought In the company of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) with the tribe of Juhaina. They fought with us terribly. When we had finished the noon prayer, the polytheists said: Had we attacked them at once. we would have killed them. Gabriel informed the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about It (about their evil design). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) made a mention of it to us, adding that they (the polytheists) had also said: Shortly there would be time for the 'Asr prayer. which is dearer o them (the Muslims) than even their children. So when the time of the 'Asr prayer came. we formed ourselves into two rows, while the polytheists were between us and the Qibla. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Allah is Most Great, and we also said so. He bowed and we also bowed. He went down in prostration and the first row prostrated along with him. When they stood up, the second row went down in prostration. Then the first row went into the rear, and the second row came in the front and occupied the place of the first row. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then said: Allah is Most Great, and we also said so. He then bowed, and we also bowed. He then went down in prostration and along with him the row also (went down in prostration), and the second row remained standing. And when the second row had also prostrated and all of them sat down then the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) pronounced salutation to them. Abu Zubair said: Jabir made a mention specially of this thing: just as your chiefs observe prayer.
[1828]
Sahl b. Abu Hathma reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) led his Companions in prayer in danger. He made them stand in two rows behind him. He led them who were close to him in one rak'ah. He then stood up and kept standing till those who were behind them observed one rak'ah. Then they (those standing in the second row) came in front and those who were in front went into the rear. He then led them In one rak'ah. He then sat down, till those who were behind him observed one rak'ah and then pronounced salutation.
[1829]
Yazid b. Ruman told on the authority of Salih b. Khawwat on the authority of one who prayed in time of danger with Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) at the Battle of Dhat ar-Riqa' that a group formed a row and prayed along with him, and a group faced the enemy. He led the group which was along with him in a rak'ah, then remained standing while they finished the prayer by themselves. Then they departed and formed a row facing the enemy. Then the second group came and he led them in the remaining rak'ah, after which he remained seated while they finished the prayer themselves. He then led them in salutation.
[1830]
Jabir reported: We went forward with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and when we reached Dhat ar-Riqa', we came to a shady tree which -we left for him One of the polytheists came there and, seeing the sword of the Messenger (may peace be upon him) hanging by a free. took it up. drew it from the scabbard and said to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him): Are you afraid of Me? He (the Holy Prophet) said: No. He again said: Who would protect you from me? He said: Allah will protect me from you. The Companions of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) threatened him. He sheathed the sword and hung it up. Then call to prayer was made and he (the Holy Prophet) led a group in two rak'ah. Then (the members of this group) withdrew and he led the second group in two rak'ah. So the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed four rak'ah and people observed two rak'ah.
[1831]
Abu Salama b. 'Abd al-Rahman reported that Jabir told him that he had observed the prayer in danger with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (first) led one of the two groups in two rak'ah of prayer. and then led the second group in two rak'ah of prayer. So the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed four rak'ah and led in two rak'ah each of the groups.
We have already explained that Islam exhorts its followers to make their social life a visible expression of God-consciousness. Prayer is the most effective means of fostering this virtue in man That is the reason why it has been made essential for the Muslims to observe obligatory prayers in congregation. Jumu'a is a step forward in this respect. The purpose behind it is to provide opportunities to the greater number of Muslims to attend larger congregations in the mosques in an atmosphere of religions piety. Apart from prayer, sermon has also been made an integral part of the Jumu'a prayer. The Imam delivers the sermon and instructs people in religion. He explains to them the day-to-day problems in the light of Islam.
[1832]
Abdullah is reported to have heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you intends to come for Jumu'a prayer, he should take a bath.
[1833]
Abdullah b. Umar is reported to have said that The Messenger of Allah (may peace be up on him)was standing on the pulpit when he said this: He who comes for Jumu'a he should take a bath.
[1834]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn Umar by another chain of transmitters.
[1835]
'Abdullah (b. Umar) reported on the authority of his father that he beard like this from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[1836]
'Abdullah (b. 'Umar) reported from his father that while he was addressing the people on Friday (sermon), a person, one of the Companions of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), entered (the mosque). Umar said to him loudly: What is this hour (for attending the prayer)? He said: I was busy today and I did not return to my house when I heard the call (to Friday prayer), and I did no more but performed ablution only. Upon this Umar said: just ablution ! You know that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded (us) to take a bath (on Friday).
[1837]
Abu Huraira reported: Umar b. Khattab was delivering a sermon to the people on Friday when 'Uthman b. 'Affan came there. 'Umar hinting to him said: What would become of those persons who come after the call to prayer? Upon this 'Uthman said: Commander of the faithful, I did no more than this that after listening to the call, I performed ablution and came (to the mosque). 'Umar said: Just ablution ! Did you not bear the Messenger of Allah (my peace be upon him) say this: When any one of you comes for Jumu'a, he should take a bath.
[1838]
Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Taking a bath on Friday is essential for every adult person.
[1839]
'Aisha reported: The people came for Jumu'a prayer from their houses in the neighbouring villages dressed in woollen garments on which dust was settled and this emitted a foal smell. A person among them (those who were dressed so) came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) while he was in my house. The Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) said to him: Were you to cleanse yourselves on this day.
[1840]
'Aisha reported: The people (mostly) were workers and they had no servants. Ill-smell thus emitted out of them. It was said to them: Were you to take bath on Friday.
[1841]
'Abd al-Rahman son of Abd Sa'id al-Khudri reported on the authority of his father that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Bathing on Friday for every adult, using of Miswak and applying some perfume, that is available-these are essential. So far as the perfume is concerned, it may be that used by a lady.
[1842]
Tawus reported that Ibn Abbas narrated the words of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) about taking bath on Friday. Tawus said: I asked Ibn Abbas it one should apply to oneself perfume or oil which is available with his wife. He (Ibn Abbas) said: I do not know of it.
[1843]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn Juraij with the came chain of transmitters.
[1844]
Abu Huraira reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said. it is the right of Allah upon every Muslim that he should take a bath (at least) on one day (Friday) during the seven days (of the week) and he should wash his head and body .
[1845]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of, Allah (may peace be upon him) said. He who takes a bath on Friday, the bath which is obligatory after the sexual discharge and then goes (to the mosque), he is like one who offers a she-camel as a sacrifice, and he who comes at the second hour would be like one who offers a cow, and he who comes at the third hour is live one who offers a ram with horns, and he who comes at the fourth hour is like one who offers a hen, and he who comes at the fifth hour is like one who offers an egg. And when the Imam comes out, the angels are also present and listen to the mention of God (the sermon).
[1846]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If you (even) ask your companion to be quiet on Friday while the Imam is delivering the sermon, you have in fact talked irrelevance.
[1847]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Abu Huraira by another chain of transmitters.
[1848]
The same hadith has been narrated by Abu Huraira, but instead of the word laghauta the word laghita has been used. Abu Zinad (one of the narrators) says that laghita is the dialect of Abu Huraira, whereas it is laghauta.
[1849]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is a time on Friday at which no Muslim servant would pray and would ask Allah for a thing (that is good) but He would give it to him. Qutaiba pointed with the help of his hand that it (the time) is short.
[1850]
Abu Huraira reported Abu'l-Qasim (the kunya of the Holy Prophet) (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is a time on Friday at which no Muslim would stand and pray and beg Allah for what Is good but He would give it to him; and he pointed with his hand that (this time) is short and narrow.
[1851]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Abu Huraira.
[1852]
This hadith has been narrated by Abu Huraira by another chain of transmitters.
[1853]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (way peace be upon him) as saying. There is a time on Friday at which no Muslim would ask Allah for what is good but He would give it to him. And further said: This is a very short time.
[1854]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported this hadith from Abu Huraira who reported from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) but he did not say: "That time is short."
[1855]
Abu Burda b. Abu Musa al-Ash'ari reported: 'Abdullah b. Umar said to me: Did you hear anything from your father narrating something from the messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about the time on Friday? I said: Yes, I heard him say from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (these words): "It is between the time when the Imam sits down and the end of the prayer."
[1856]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The best day on which the sun has risen is Friday; on it Adam was created, on it he was made to enter Paradise, on it he. was expelled from it.
[1857]
Abu Huraira reported the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: The best day on which the sun has risen is Friday; on it Adam was created. on it he was made to enter Paradise, on it he was expelled from it. And the last hour will take place on no day other than Friday.
[1858]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: We who are the last shall be the first on the Day of Resurrection, except that every Ummah was given the Book before us and we were given it after them. It was this day which Allah prescribed for us and guided us to it and the people came after us with regard to it, the Jews observing the next day and the Christians the day following that.
[1859]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) said: We are the last and would be the first on the Day of Resurrection.
[1860]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: We are the last (but) we would be the first on the Day of Resurrection, and we would be the first to enter Paradise, but that they were given the Book before us and we were given after them. They disagreed and Allah guided us aright on whatever they disagreed regarding the truth. And it was this day of theirs about which they disagreed, but Allah guided us to it, and that is Friday for us; the next day is for the Jews and the day following for the Christians.
[1861]
Abu Huraira reported Muhammad, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), as saying: We who are the last would be the first on the Day of Resurrection but they (other Ummahs) were given the Book before us and we were given after them, and this was the day that was prescribed for them but they disagreed on it. And Allah guided us to it. and they came after us with regard to it, the Jews observing the next day and the Christians the day following that.
[1862]
It is narrated by Abu Huraira and Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: It was Friday from which Allah diverted those who were before us. For the Jews (the day set aside for prayer) was Sabt (Saturday), and for the Christians it was Sunday. And Allah turned towards us and guided us to Friday (as the day of prayer) for us. In fact, He (Allah) made Friday, Saturday and Sunday (as days of prayer). In this order would they (Jews and Christians) come after us on the Day of Resurrection. We are the last of (the Ummahs) among the people in this world and the first among the created to be judged on the Day of Resurrection. In one narration it is: ',to be judged among them".
[1863]
Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: We were guided aright to Friday (as a day of prayer and meditation), but Allah diverted those who were before us from it. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[1864]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When it is Friday, the angels stand at every door of the mosque and record the people in the order of their arrival, and when the Imam sits (on the pulpit for delivering the sermon) they fold up their sheets (manuscripts of the Qur'an) and listen to the mention (of Allah). And he who comes early is like one who offers a she-camel as a sacrifice, the next like one who offers a cow, the next a ram, the next a hen, the next an egg.
[1865]
This hadith has been narrated by Abu Huratra through another chain of transmitters.
[1866]
Abu Huraira reported Allah Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: There is an angel on every door of the mosque recording him first who (conies) first (a the mosque for Friday prayer). And he [the Prophet] likened him as one who offers a camel as a sacrifice and then he went on in the descending order till he reached the point at which the minimum (sacrifice) is that of an egg. And when the Imam sits (on the pulpit) the sheets are folded and they (the angels) attend to the mention of Allah.
[1867]
Abu-Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who took a bath and then came for Jumu'a prayer and then prayed what was fixed for him, then kept silence till the Imam finished the sermon, and then prayed along with him, his sins between that time and the next Friday would be forgiven, and even of three days wore.
[1868]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who performed ablution well, then came to Friday prayer, listened (to the sermon), kept silence all (his sins) between that time and the next Friday would be forgiven with three days extra, and he who touched pebbles caused an interruption.
[1869]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: We used to observe (Jumu'a) prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and then we returned and gave rest to our camels used for carrying water. Hassan[ (one of the narrators) said: I asked Ja'far what time that was. He said.. It is the time when the sun passes the meridian.
[1870]
Ja'far reported on the authority of his father that he asked Jabir b. 'Abdullah when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed Jumu'a prayer. Re said: He used to observe prayer, and we then went (back) to our camels and gave them rest. 'Abdullah made this addition in his narration: "Till the sun passed the meridian. and the camels used for carrying water (took rest)."
[1871]
Sahl b. Said said: We did not have a siesta or lunch till after the Friday prayer. (Ibn Hujr added:) "Daring the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)."
[1872]
Iyas b. Salama b. al-Akwa' reported on the authority of his father: We used to observe the Friday prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) when the sun passed the meridian. and we then returned and tried to find out afternoon shadow (of the walls for protecting themselves from the heat of the sun).
[1873]
Iyas b. Salama b. Akwa' reported on the authority of his father, saying: We used to observe the Friday prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and when we returned we did not find the shadow of the walls in which we could take protection (from the heat of the sun).
[1874]
Ibn 'Umar said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to deliver the sermon on Friday while standing. He would then sit and then stand (for the second sermon) as they (the Muslims) do nowadays.
[1875]
Jabir b. Samura said: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) gave two sermons between which he sat, recited the Qur'an and exhorted the people.
[1876]
Jabir b. Samura said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to deliver the sermon while standing. He would then sit down and then stand up and address in a standing posture; and whoever informed you that he (the Holy Prophet) delivered the sermon while sitting told a lie. By Allah. I prayed with him more than two thousand times.
[1877]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that the Apostle (may peace be upon him) was delivering the sermon on Friday in a standing posture when a caravan from Syria arrived. The people flocked towards it till no one was left (with the Holy Prophet) but twelve persons, and it was on this occasion that this verse in regard to Jumu'a was revealed. "And when they see merchandise or sport. they break away to it and leave thee standing."
[1878]
This hadith has been narrated by Husain with the same chain of transmitters but with this alteration that he did not make mention of the standing position.
[1879]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported: I was along with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) on Friday when a caravan arrived. The people went to it, and none but twelve persons were left behind and I was one of them; and it was on this occasion that this verse was revealed: "And when they see merchandise or sport away to it, and leave thee standing" (lxii. 1 1). they break
[1880]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported: While the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was delivering (a sermon) on Friday, a caravan of merchandise came to Medina. The Companions of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) rushed towards it till only twelve persons were left with him including Abu Bakr and 'Umar; and it was at this occasion that this verse was revealed. "And when they see merchandise or sport, they break away to it."
[1881]
Ka'b b. 'Ujra reported that he entered the mosque and saw Abd al-Rahman b. Umm Hakam delivering the sermon in a sitting posture. Upon this he said: Look at this wretched person; he delivers the sermon while sitting, whereas Allah said: "And when they see merchandise or sport, they break away to it and leave thee standing."
[1882]
Abdullah b. Umar and Abu Huraira said that they heard Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) say on the planks of his pulpit: People most cease to neglect the Friday prayer or Allah will seal their hearts and then they will be among the negligent.
[1883]
Jabir b. Samura reported: I used to pray with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and both his prayer and sermon were of moderate length.
[1884]
Jabir b. Samura reported: I used to observe prayer with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and his prayer was of moderate length and his sermon too was of moderate length.
[1885]
Jabir b. Abdullah said: When Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) delivered the sermon, his eyes became red, his voice rose. and his anger increased so that he was like one giving a warning against the enemy and saying: "The enemy has made a morning attack on you and in the evening too." He would also say: "The last Hour and I have been sent like these two." and he would join his forefinger and middle finger; and would further say: "The best of the speech is embodied in the Book of Allah, and the beet of the guidance is the guidance given by Muhammad. And the most evil affairs are their innovations; and every innovation is error." He would further say: ,I am more dear to a Muslim even than his self; and he who left behind property that is for his family. and he who dies under debt or leaves children (in helplessness). the responsibility (of paying his debt and bringing up his children) lies on me."
[1886]
Ja'far b. Muhammad said on the authority of his father: I heard Jabir b. 'Abdullah saying that in the sermon of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) he praised Allah, lauded Him (and subsequently said [other words] and raised his voice, and the rest of the hadith is the same).
[1887]
Jabir reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), while delivering the sermon' to the people, praised Allah, and lauded Him for what He deserves, and would then say: He whom Allah guides aright, there is none to mislead him, and he who is led astray, there is none to guide him (aright), and the best of the talk is embodied in the Book of Allah. And the rest of the hadith is the same.
[1888]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: Dimad came to Mecca and he belonged to the tribe of Azd Shanu'a, and he used to protect the person who was under the influence of charm. He heard the foolish people of Mecca say that Muhammad (may peace be upon him) was under the spell. Upon this he said: If I were to come across this man, Allah might cure him at my hand. He met him and said: Muhammad, I can protect (one) who is under the influence of charm, and Allah cures one whom He so desires at my hand. Do you desire (this)? Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Praise is due to Allah, we praise Him, ask His help; and he whom Allah guides aright there is none to lead him astray, and he who is led astray there is none to guide him, and I bear testimony to the fact that there is no god but Allah, He is One, having no partner with Him, and that Muhammad is His Servant and Messenger. Now after this he (Dimad) said: Repeat these words of yours before me, and the messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) repeated these to him thrice; and he said I have heard the words of soothsayers and the words of magicians, and the words of poets, but I have never heard such words as yours, and they reach the depth (of the ocean of eloquence); bring forth your hand so that I should take oath of fealty to you on Islam. So he took an oath of allegiance to him. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: It (this allegiance of yours) is on behalf of your people too. He said: It is on behalf of my people too. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent an expedition and the flying column passed by his people. The leader of the flying column said to the detachment: Did you find anything from these people? One of the people said: I found a utensil for water. Upon this he (the commander) said: Return it, for he is one of the people of Dimad.
[1889]
Abu Wa'il reported: 'Ammar delivered to us the sermon. It was short and eloquent. When he (,Ammir) descended (from the pulpit) we said to him: 0 Abd al-Yaqzn, you have delivered a short and eloquent sermon. Would that you had lengthened (the sermon). He said: I have heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: The lengthening of prayer by a man and the shortness of the sermon is the sign of his understanding (of faith). So lengthen the prayer and shorten the sermon, for there is charm (in precise) expression.
[1890]
'Adi b. Hatim reported that a person recited a sermon before the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) thus: He who obeys Allay and His Apostle, he in fact follows the right path, and he who disobeys both of them, he goes astray. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: What a bad speaker you are; say: He who disobeys Allah and His Apostle. Ibn Numair added: He in fact went astray.
[1891]
Safwan b. Ya'la reported on the authority of his father that he heard the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) reciting (verses of the Qur'an) on the pulpit. and "They cried: 0 Malik."
[1892]
'Amra daughter of Abd al-Rahman reported on the authority of the sister of Amra, I memorised (surah) Qaf-surah l.): "By the glorious Qur'an" from the mouth of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on Friday for he recited it on the pulpit on-every Friday.
[1893]
The daughter of Haritha b. Nu'man said: I did not memorise (Surah) Qaf but from the mouth of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as he used to deliver the. sermon along with it on every Friday. She also added: Our oven and that of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was one.
[1894]
Umm Bisham hint Haritha b. Nu'man said: Our oven and that of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was one for two years, or for one year or for a part of a year; and I learnt "Qaf. By the Glorious Qur'an" from no other source than the tongue of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) who used to recite it every Friday on the pulpit when he delivered the sermon to the people.
[1895]
Umara b. Ruwaiba said he saw Bishr b. Marwan on the pulpit raising his hands and said: Allah, disfigure these hands! I have seen Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gesture no more than this with his hands, and he pointed with his forefinger.
[1896]
This hadith has been narrated by another chain of transmitters on the authority of Husain b. Abd al-Rahman.
[1897]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that while Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was delivering the sermon on Friday a person came there, and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to him: So and so, have you prayed (two rak'ahs)? He said: No. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Then stand and pray.
[1898]
This hadith is narrated by Jabir through another chain of transmitters but Hammad (one of the narrators) made no mention of the two rak'ahs.
[1899]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah said that a person entered the Mosque while the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was delivering the sermon on Friday. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: Have you observed prayer? He said: No. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Stand and offer the two rak'ahs. According to Qutaiba, the words are: "He said: Offer two rak'ahs."
[1900]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that a person came (in the Mosque) while the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was delivering the sermon on Friday (standing) on the pulpit. He (the Holy Prophet) said to him: Have you offered two rak'ahs? He said: No. Upon this he said: Then observe (them).
[1901]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah said that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) delivered the sermon and said: When any one of you comes for the Friday (prayer) and the Imam comes out (from his apartment), (even then) should observe two rak'ahs (of prayer).
[1902]
Jabir reported that Sulaik Ghatafani came on Friday (for prayer) while the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was sitting on the pulpit. Sulaik also sat down before observing prayer. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Have you observed two rak'ahs? He said: No. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Stand and observe them
[1903]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: Sulaik Ghatafani came on Friday when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was delivering the sermon. He (Sulaik) sat down. He (the Holy Prophet) said to him: 0 Sulaik I stand and observe two rak'ahs and make them short, and then said: When any one of you comes on Friday, while the Imam delivers the sermon, he should observe two rak'ahs and should make them short.
[1904]
Abu Rifa'a reported: I came to the Holy Prophet (way peace be upon him) when he was delivering the sermon, and I said: Messenger of Allah, here is a stranger and he wants to learn about this religion and he does not know what this religion is. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) looked at me and left his sermon till he came to me, and he was given a chair and I thought that Its legs were made of iron. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sat In it and he began to teach me what Allah had taught him. He then came (to the pulpit) for his sermon and completed it to the end.
[1905]
Ibn Abu Rafi' said: Marwan appointed Abu Huraira as his deputy in Medina and he himself left t for Mecca. Abu Huraira led as in the Jumu'a prayer and recited after Surah Jumu'a in the second rak'ah: "When the hypocrites came to thee" (Surah lxiii.). I then met Abu Huraira as he came back and said to him: You have recited two surahs which 'Ali b. Abu Talib used to recite in Kufah. Upon this Abu Huraira said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace: be upon him) 'reciting these two in the Friday (prayer).
[1906]
This hadith is narrated by Abdullah b. Abu Rafi' with the same chain of transmitters but with this modification: "That he recited Surah Jumu'a (lxii.) in the first rak'ah and "The hypocrites came" in the second rak'ah.
[1907]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite on two 'Ids and in Friday prayer: "Glorify The name of Thy Lord, the Most High" (Surah lxxxvii.), and: "Has there come to thee the news of the overwhelming event" (lxxxviii.). And when the 'Id and Jumu'a combined on a day he recited these two (surah) in both the prayers.
[1908]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibrahim b Muhammad b. al-Muntashir with the same chain of transmitters.
[1909]
Dahhak b. Qais wrote to Nu'man b. Bashir asking him what the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited on Friday besides Surah Jumu'a He said that he recited: "Has there reached . . . " (Surah lxxxviii,).
[1910]
Ibn Abbas reported: The Apostle of Allah (way peace be upon him) used to recite in the morning prayer on Friday Surah "Alif-Lam-Mim, Tanz'il ul-Sajda"(Surah xxxii.): Surely there came over the man a time" (Surah lxxvii) and he used to recite in Jumu'a prayer Surahs Jumu'a and al-Munafiqin.
[1911]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Sufyan with the same chain of transmitters.
[1912]
Mukhawwil has narrated this hadith on the authority of Sufyan.
[1913]
Abu Huraira reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite in the dawn prayer on Friday "Alif-Lam-Mim, Tanzil" and "Surely there came."
[1914]
Abu Huraira reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite in the dawn prayer on Friday: "Alif-Lam-Mim, Tanzil" in the first rak'ah, and in the second one: "Surely there came over the man a time when he was nothing that could be mentioned."
[1915]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you observes the Jumu'a prayer (two obligatory rak'ahs in congregation), he should observe four (rak'ahs) afterwards.
[1916]
Suhail reported on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When you observe prayer after (the two obligatory raklabs) of Jumu'a, you should observe four rak'ahs (and 'Amr in his narration has made this addition that Ibn Idris said this on the authority of Suhail): And if you are in a hurry on account of something, you should observe two rak'ahs in the mosque and two when you return (to your house).
[1917]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one amongst you observes prayer after Jumu'a, he should observe four rak'ahs. (In the hadith transmitted by Jarir the word minkum is not recorded.)
[1918]
Nafi' reported that when 'Abdullah (b. 'Umar) observed the Friday prayer and came back he observed two rak'ahs in his house, and then said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be updn him) used to do this.
[1919]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar, while describing the Nafl prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), said: He did not observe (Nafl) prayer after Jumu'a till he went back and observed two rak'ahs in his house. Yahya said: I guess that I uttered these words (before Imam Malik) that he of course observed (them).
[1920]
Salim narrated on the authority of his father that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe two rak'ahs after Jumu'a.
[1921]
'Umar b. 'Ata' b. Abu Khuwar said that Nafi' b. Jubair sent him to al- Sa'ib the son of Namir's sister with a view to asking him about what he had seen in the prayer of Mu'awiya. He said: Yes, I observed the Jumu'a prayer along with him in Maqsura and when the Imam pronounced salutation I stood up at my place and observed (Sunan rak'ahs). As he entered (the apartment) he sent for me and said: Do not repeat what you have done. Whenever you have observed the Jumu'a prayer, do not observe (Sunan prayer) till you, have talked or got out For the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had ordered us to do this and not to combine two (types of) prayers without talking of going out.
[1922]
The same hadith is narrated on the authority of 'Umar b. Ata' but with this modification: When he (the Imam) pronounced salutation I stood up at my place. No mention was made of the Imam in it.
[1923]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: I participated in the Fitr prayer with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and Abu Bakr, 'Umar and 'Uthman, and all of them observed this prayer before the Khutba, and then he (the Holy Prophet) delivered the sermon. Then the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) descended (from the pulpit) and I (perceive) as if I am seeing him as he is commanding people with his hand to sit down. He then made his way through their (assembly) till he came to the women. Bilal was with him. He then recited (this verse): O Prophet, when believing women come to thee giving thee a pledge that they will not associate aught with Allah" (lx. 12) till he finished (his address to) them and then said: Do you conform to it (what has been described in the verse)? Only one woman among them replied: Yes, Apostle of Allah, but none else replied. He (the narrator) said: It could not be ascertained who actually she was. He (the Holy Prophet) exhorted them to give alms. Bilal stretched his cloth and then said: Come forward with alms. Let my father and mother be taken as ransom for you. And they began to throw rings and ringlets in the cloth of Bilal.
[1924]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: I bear testimony to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) offering prayer before Kbutba. He (after saying prayer) delivered the Kutba, and he found that the women could not hear it, so he came to them and exhorted them and preached them and commanded them to give alms, and Bilal had stretched his cloth and the women were throwing rings, earrings and other things. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ayyub with the same chain of transmitters.
[1925]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up on the day of 'Id al-Fitr and observed prayer. And he commenced the prayer before the sermon. He then delivered the sermon. When the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had finished (the sermon) he came down from (the pulpit), and made his way to the women and exhorted them (to do good acts), and he was leaning on the hand of Bilal. Bilal had stretched his cloth in which women were throwing alms. I (one of the narrators) said to 'Ata' (the other narrator) : It must be Zakat on the day of Fitr. He ('Ata') said: No. It was alms (which) they were giving on that occasion, and a woman gave her ring, and then others gave, and then others gave. I said to 'Ata': Is It right now for the Imam to come to the women when he has finished (his address to the men) that he should exhort them (to good deeds)? He said: (Why not) by my life, it is right for them (to do so). What is the matter with them that they do not do it now ?
[1926]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: I observed prayer with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the 'Id day. He commenced with prayer before the sermon without Adhan and Iqama. He then stood up leaning on Bilal, and he commanded (them) to be on guard (against evil for the sake of) Allah, and he exhorted (them) on obedience to Him, and he preached to the people and admonished them. He then walked on till he came to the women and preached to them and admonished them, and asked them to give alms, for most of them are the fuel for Hell. A woman having a dark spot on the cheek stood up and said: Why is it so, Messenger of Allah? He said: For you grumble often and show ingratitude to your spouse. And then they began to give alms out of their ornaments such as their earrings and rings which they threw on to the cloth of Bilal.
[1927]
Ibn 'Abbas and Jaibir b. 'Abdullah al-Ansari reported: There was no Adhan on the (occasion) of Id-ul-Fitr and Id-ul-Adha. I (Ibn Juraij) said: I asked him after some time about it. He ('Ata', one of the narrators) said: Jabir b. 'Abdullah al-Ansari told me: There is neither any Adhan on Id-ul-Fitr when the Imam comes out, nor even after his coming out; their is neither lqama nor call nor anything of the sort of calling on that day and nor Iqama.
[1928]
'Ata' reported that Ibn 'Abbas sent (him) to Ibn Zubair at the commencement of the oath of allegiance to him (for Caliphate saying): As there is no Adhan on 'Id-ul-Fitr, so you should not pronounce it. Ibn Zubair did not pronounce Adhan on that day. He (Ibn 'Abbas) also sent him (with this message) that sermon (is to be delivered) after the prayer, and thus it was done. So lbn Zubair observed prayer before Khutba.
[1929]
Jabir b. Samura said: I prayed with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prayers on two I'ds wore than once or twice without there being Adhan and Iqama.
[1930]
Ibn 'Umar reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), Abu Bakr and 'Umar used to observe the two 'Id prayers before the sermon.
[1931]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to go out on the day of Adha and on the day of Fitr and commenced the prayer. And after having observed his prayer and pronounced the salutation, he stood up facing people as they were seated at their places of worship. And if he intended to send out an army he made mention of it to the people, and if he intended any other thing besides it, he commanded them (to do that). He used to say (to the people): Give alms, give alms, give alms, and the majority that gave alms was of women. He then returned and this (practice) remained (in vogue) till Marwan b. al- Hakam (came into power). I went out hand in hand with Marwan till we came to the place of worship and there Kathir b. Salt had built a pulpit of clay and brick. Marwan began to tug me with his hand as though he were pulling me towards the pulpit, while I was pulling him towards the prayer. When I saw him doing that I said: What has happened to the practice of beginning with prayer? He said: No, Abu Sa'id, what you are familiar with has been abandoned. I thereupon said (three times and went back): By no means, by Him in Whose hand my life is, you are not doing anything better than what I am familiar with.
[1932]
Umm 'Atiyya said: He (the Apostle of Allah) commanded us that we should take out unmarried women and purdah-observing ladies for 'Id prayers, and he commanded the menstruating women to remain away from the place of worship of the Muslims.
[1933]
Umm Atiyya reported: We were commanded to bring out on old days purdah-observing ladies and those unmarried, and menstruating women came out but remained behind people and pronounced takbir (Allah-o-Akbar) along with them.
[1934]
Umm 'Atiyya reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded us to bring out on'Id-ul-Fitr and 'Id-ul-Adha young women, menstruating women and purdah-observing ladies, menstruating women kept back from prayer, but participated in goodness and supplication of the Muslims. I said: Messenger of Allah, one of us does not have an outer garment (to cover her face and body). He said: Let her sister cover her with her outer garment.
[1935]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out on the day of Adha or Fitr and observed two rak'ahs, and did not observe prayer (at that place) before and after that. He then came to the women along with Bilal and commanded them to give alms and the women began to give their rings and necklaces.
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[1936]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that (his father) 'Umar b. Khattab asked Abu Waqid al-Laithi what the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to recite on 'Id-ul-Adha and 'Id-ul-Fitr. He said: He used to recite in them: "Qaf. By the Glorious Qur'an" (Surah 1), "The Hour drew near, and the moon was rent asunder" (Surah liv.).
[1937]
'Utba reported that his father Waqid al-Laithi said: 'Umar b. Khattab asked me what the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited on 'Id day. I said: "The Hour drew near" and Qaf. By the Glorious Qur'an".
[1938]
'A'isha reported: Abu Bakr came to see me and I had two girls with me from among the girls of the Ansar and they were singing what the Ansar recited to one another at the Battle of Bu'ath. They were not, however, singing girls. Upon this Abu Bakr said: What I (the playing of) this wind instrument of Satan in the house of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and this too on 'Id day? Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : Abu Bakr, every people have a festival and it is our festival (so let them play on).
[1939]
This hadith has been narrated by Hisham with the same chain of transmitters, but there the words are: "Two girls were playing upon a tambourine."
[1940]
'A'isha reported that Abu Bakr came to her and there were with her two girls on Adha days who were singing and beating the tambourine and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had wrapped himself with his mantle. Abu Bakr scolded them. The Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) uncovered (his face) and said: Abu Bakr, leave them alone for these are the days of 'Id. And 'A'isha said: I recapitulate to my mind the fact that once the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) screened me with his mantle and I saw the sports of the Abyssinians, and I was only a girl, and so you can well imagine how a girl of tender age is fond of watching the sport.
[1941]
'A'isha reported: BY Allah, I remember the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) standing on the door of my apartment screening me with his mantle enabling me to see the sport of the Abyssinians as they played with their daggers in the mosque of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upom him). He (the Holy Prophet) kept standing for my sake till I was satiated and then I went back; and thus you can well imagine how long a girl tender of age who is fond of sports (could have watched it).
[1942]
'A'isha reported: The Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) came (in my apartment) while there were two girls with me singing the song of the Battle of Bu'ath. He lay down on the bed and turned away his face. Then came Abu Bakr and he scolded me and said: Oh ! this musical instrument of the devil in the house of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) ! The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) turned towards him and said: Leave them alone. And when he (the Holy Prophet) became unattentive, I hinted them and they went out, and it was the day of 'Id and negroes were playing with shields and speare. (I do not remember) whether I asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) or whether he said to me if I desired to see (that sport). I said: Yes. I stood behind him with his face parallel to my face, and he said: O Banu Arfada, be busy (in your sports) till I was satiated. He said (to me): Is that enough? I said: Yes. Upon this he asked me to go.
[1943]
'A'isha reported that some Abyssinians came and gave a demonstration of armed fight on the 'Id day in the mosque. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) invited me (to see that fight). I placed my head on his shoulder and began to see their sport till it was I who turned away from watching them.
[1944]
This hadith has been narrated by Hisham with the same chain of transmitters but (the narrators) did not make mention of the mosque.
[1945]
'A'isha said that she sent a message to the players (of this armed fight) saying: I like to see them (fighting). She further said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up and I stood at the door (behind him) and saw (this fight) between his ears and his shoulders they played in the mosque. 'Ata' (one of the narra- tors) said: Were they persians or Abyssinians? Ibn 'Atiq told me they were Abyssinians.
[1946]
Abu Huraira reported: While the Abyssinians were busy playing with their arms in the presence of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) 'Umar b. Khattab came there. He bent down to take up pebbles to throw at them (in order to make them go off). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to him: 'Umar, leave them alone.
[1947]
'Abdullah b. Zaid b. Mazini reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went to the place of prayer and prayed for rain and turned round his mantle while facing the Qibla.
[1948]
Ibn Tamim narrated on the authority of his uncle ('Abdullah b. Zaid) that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out to the place of prayer and prayed for rain and faced towards Qibla, and turned round his mantle and prayed two rak'ahs.
[1949]
'Abdullah b. Zaid al-Ansari reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out to the place of prayer in order to offer prayer for rainfall. And when he intended to make supplication he faced Qibla and turned round his mantle.
[1950]
'Abbad b. Tamim Mazini heard his uncle, who was one of the Companions of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), as saying: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out one day in order to pray for rain. He turned his back towards people, supplicated before Allah, facing towards Qibla, and turned his mantle round and then observed two rak'ahs of prayer.
[1951]
Anas reported: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) raising his hands (high enough) in supplication (for rain) that the whiteness of his armpits became visible.
[1952]
Anas b. Malik reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) prayed for rain pointing the back of his hands to the sky.
[1953]
Anas reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was not accustomed to raice his hands in any supplication he made except when praying for rain. (He would then raise [his hands] high enough) that the whiteness of his armpits became visible. 'Abd al-A'la said that (he was in doubt whether it was) the whiteness of his armpit or armpits.
[1954]
This hadith has been narrated by Anas b. Malik through another chain of transmitters.
[1955]
Anas b. Malik reported that a person entered the mosque through the door situated on theside of Daral-Qada' during Friday (prayer) and the messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was delivering the sermon while standing. He came and stood in front of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, the camels died and the passages were blocked; so supplicate Allah to send down rain upon us. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) raised his hands and then said: (O Allah, send down rain upon us; O Allah, send dowp rain upon us; O Allah, send down rain upon us. Anas said: By Allah, we did not see any cloud or any patch of it, and there was neither any house or building standing between us and the (hillock) Sal'a. There appeared a cloud in the shape of a shield from behind it, and as it (came high) in the sky it spread and then there was a downpour of rain. By Allah, we did not see the sun throughout the week. Then (that very man) came on the coming Friday through the same door when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was standing and delivering the sermon. He stood in front of him and said: Messenger of Allah, our animals died and the passages blocked. Supplicate Allah to stop the rain for us. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) again raised his hands and said: O Allah, let it (rain) fall in our suburbs and not on us, O Allah (send it down) on the hillocks and small mountains and the river-beds and at places where trees grow. The rain stopped, and as we stepped out we were walking in sun- shine. He (the narrator) said to Sharik: I asked Anas b. Malik if he was the same man. He said: I do not know.
[1956]
Anas b. Malik reported: The people were in the grip of famine during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and (once) as the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was delivering the sermon standing on the pulpit on Friday, a bedouin stood up and said: Messenger of Allah, the animals died and the children suffered starvation. The rest of the hadith is the same (and the words are) that he (the Holy Prophet) said: O Allah, send down rain in our suburbs but not on us. He (the narrator) said: To whichever directions he pointed with his hands, the clouds broke up and I saw Medina like the opening of a (courtyard) and the stream of Qanat flowed for one month, and none came from any part (of Arabia) but with the news of heavy rainfall.
[1957]
Anas b. Malik reported that while the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was delivering the sermon on Friday, people stood up before him and said in a loud voice: Apostle of Allah, there is a drought and the trees have become yellow, the animals have died; and the rest of the hadith is the same, and in the narration transmitted by 'Abd al-A'la the words are: " The clouds cleard from Medina and it began to rain around it and not a single drop of rain fell in Medina. And as I looked towards Medina, I found it hollow like (the hollowness of) a basin.
[1958]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas but with this addition: "Allah gathered the clouds and as we (were obliged) to stay back I saw that even the strong man, impelled by a desire to go to his family, (could not do so)."
[1959]
'Ubaidullah b. Anas b. Malik heard (his father) Anas b. Malik as saying: A bedouin came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on Friday as he was (delivering the sermon on his) pulpit; and the rest of the hadith is the same but with this addition: "I saw the cloud clearing just as a sheet is folded."
[1960]
Anas (b. Malik) reported: It rained upon us as we were with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). The Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) removed his cloth (from a part of his body) till the rain fell on it. We said: Messenger of Allah, why did you do this? He said: It is because it (the rainfall) has just come from the Exalted Lord.
[1961]
'Ata' b. Abi Rabah reported that he heard 'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (way peace be upon him), as saying: When there was on any day windstorm or dark cloud (its effects) could be read on the face of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and he moved forward and backward (in a state of anxiety); and when it rained, he was delighted and it (the state of restlessness) disappeared. 'A'isha said: I asked him the reason of this anxiety and he said : I was afraid that it might be a calamity that might fall upon my Ummah, and when he saw rainfall he said: It is the mercy (of Allah).
[1962]
'Ata' b. Rabah reported on the authority of 'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (way peace be upon him), who said: Whenever the wind was stormy, the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to say: O Allah ! I ask Thee for what is good in it, and the good which it contains, and the good of that which it was sent for. I seek refuge with Thee from what is evil in it, what evil it contains, and the evil of that what it was sent for; and when there was a thunder and lightning in the sky, his colour underwent a change, and he went out and in, backwards and forwards; and when the rain came, he felt relieved, and I noticed that (the sign of relief) on his face. 'A'isha asked him (about it) and he said: It may be as the people of 'Ad said: When they saw a cloud formation coming to their valley they said: "It is a cloud which would give us rain" (Qur'an, xlvi. 24).
[1963]
'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), reported: I never saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) laugh to such an extent that I could see his uvula-whereas he used to smile only-and when he saw dark clouds or wind, (the signs of fear) were depicted on his face. I said: Messenger of Allah, I find people being happy when they ace the dark cloud in the hope that it would bring rain, but I find that when you see that (the cloud) there is an anxiety on your face. He said: 'A'isha, I am afraid that there may be a calamity in it, for a people was afflicted with wind, when the people saw the calamity they said: "It is a cloud which would give us rain" (Qur'an. xlvi. 24).
[1964]
Ibn 'Abbas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I have been helped by the east wind and the 'Ad were destroyed by the west wind.
[1965]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas through another chain of transmitters.
[1966]
'A'isha reported that there was a solar eclipse in the time of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He stood up to pray and prolonged his stand very much. He then bowed and prolonged very much his bowing. He then raised his head and prolonged his stand much, but it was less than the (duration) of the first stand. He then bowed and prolonged bowing much, but it was less than the duration of his first bowing. He then prostrated and then stood up and prolonged the stand, but it was less than the first stand. He then bowed and prolonged his bowing, but it was less than the first bowing. He then lifted his head and then stood up and prolonged his stand, but it was less than the first stand. He then bowed and prolonged bowing and it was less than the first bowing. He then prostrated himself ; then he turned about, and the sun had become bright, and he addressed the people. He praised Allah and landed Him and said: The sun and the moon are two signs of Allah; they are not eclipsed on account of anyones death or on account of anyone's birth. So when you see them, glorify and supplicate Allah, observe prayer, give alms. O Ummah of Muhammad, none is more indignant than Allah When His servant or maid commits fornication. O people of Muhammad, by Allah, if you knew what I know, you would weep much and laugh little.
[1967]
This hadith has been narrated by Hisham b. 'Urwa with the same chain of transmitters but with this addition: "Verily the sun and the moon are among the signs of Allah." And similarly this addition was made: "He then lifted his hands and said: O Allah ! have I not conveyed it? "
[1968]
'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), reported There was an eclipse of the sun during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). So, the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) went to the mosque and stood up and glorified Allah, and the people formed themselves in rows behind him. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) made a long recital (of the Qur'an) and then pronounced takbir and then observed a long ruku'. He then raised his head and said: Allah listened to him who praised Him: our Lord, praise is due to Thee. He then again stood up and made a long recital, which was less than the first recital. He pronounced takbir and observed a long ruku', and it was less than the first one. He again said: Allah listened to him who praised Him; our Lord, praise is due to Thee. (Abu Tahir, one of the narrators) made no mention of: "He then prostrated himself." He did like this in the second rak'ah, till he completed four rak'ahs and four prostrations and the sun became bright before he deported. He then stood up and addressed people, after lauding Allah as He deserved, and then said: The sun and the moon are two signs among the signs of Allah These do not eclipse either on the death of anyone or on his birth. So when you see them, hasten to prayer. He also said this: Observe prayer till Allah dispels the anxiety (of this extraordinary phenomenon) from you. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: I saw in my place everything which you have been promised. I even saw myself desiring to pluck a bunch (of grapes) from Paradise (and it was at the time) when you saw me moving forward. And I saw Hell and some of its parts crushing the others, when you saw me moving back; and I saw in it Ibn Luhayy and he was the person who made the she-camels loiter about. In the hadith transmitted by Abu Tahir the words are: "He hastened to prayer," and he made no mention of what follows.
[1969]
'A'isha reported that there was a solar eclipse during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) and he sent the announcer (to summon them) for congregational prayer. The people gathered together and he pronounced takbir and he observed four rak'ahs, in the form of two rak'ahs (i.e. he observed two qiyams and two ruku's in one rak'ah) and four prostrations.
[1970]
'A'isha reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited loudly in the eclipse prayer, and he observed four rak'ahs in the form of two rak'ahs and four prostrations. Zuhri said: Kathir b. 'Abbas narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed four rak'ahs and four prostrations in two rak'ahs.
[1971]
Zuhri said: Kathir b. Abbas used to narrate that Ibn 'Abbas used to relate about the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in regard to the eclipse of the sun like that what was narrated by 'Urwa on the authority of 'A'isha.
[1972]
'Ata' reported: I heard 'Ubaid b. 'Umair say: It has been narrated to me by one whom I regard as truthful, (the narrator says: I can well guess that he meant 'A'isha) that the sun eclipsed during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he stood up (in prayer) for a rigorously long time. He then bowed and then stood up and then bowed and then stood up and then bowed, thus observing three ruku's in two rak'ahs and four prostrations. He then departed and the sun brightened. He pronounced "Allah is the Greatest" while bowing. He would then bow and say: "Allah listened to him who praised Him" while lifting up his head. He then stood up, and praised Allah and lauded Him, and then said: The sun and the moon do not eclipse on the death of anyone or on his birth. But both of them are among the signs of Allah with which Allah terrifies His servants. So when you see them under eclipse, remember Allah till they are brightened. This hadith is narrated thus on the authority of 'A'isha through another chain of transmitters: "The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed six ruku's and four prostration in (two rak'ahs)."
[1973]
'Amra reported that a Jewess came to 'A'isha to ask (about something) and said: May Allah protect you from the torment of the grave ! 'A'isha said: Messenger of Allah, would people be tormented in the graves? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: (May there be) protection of Allah ! The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) mounted one morning on the ride, and the sun eclipsed. 'A'isha said: I came in the company of the women in the mosque from behind the rooms. The Messenger of Allah (way peace he upon him) dismounted from his ride and came to the place of worship where he used to pray. He stood up (to pray) and the people stood behind him. 'A'isha said: He stood for a long time. He then bowed and it was a long ruku'. He then raised his head and he stood for a long time, less than the first standing. He then bowed and his ruku' was long, but it was less than that (the first) ruku'. He then raised (his head) and the sun had become bright. He (the Holy Prophet) then said: I saw you under trial in the grave like the turmoil of Dajjal. 'Amra said: I heard 'A'isha say: I listened after this to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) seeking refuge from the torment of Fire and the torment of the grave.
[1974]
This hadith has been narrated by Yahya b. Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters.
[1975]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: The sun eclipsed on one extremely hot day during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prayed along with his Companions. He prolonged his qiyam (standing posture in prayer) till they (his Companions) began to fall down. He then observed a long ruku'. He raised his head (and stood up for long) and then observed a long ruku'. He then raised (his head and stood up) for a long time and then made two prostrations. He then stood up and did like this and thus he observed four ruku's and four prostrations (in two rak'ahs) and then said: All these things were brought to me in which you will be made to enter. Paradise was brought to me till (I was so close to it) that if I (had intended) to pluck a bunch (of grapes) out of it. I would have got it, or he (the Holy Prophet) said: I intended to get a bunch (out of that) but my hand could not reach it. Hell was also brought to me and I saw in it a woman belonging to the tribe of Israel who was tormented for a cat whom she had tied, but did not give it food nor set it free to eat the creatures of the earth; and I saw Abu Thumama 'Amr b. Malik who was dragging his intestines in Hell. They (the Arabs) used to say that the sun and the moon do not eclipse but on the death of some great person; but (in reality) both these (the sun and the moon) are among the signs of Allah which are shown to you; so when there is an eclipse, observe prayer till it (the sun or the moon) brightens. This hadith has been narrated by Hisham with the same chain of transmitters except this "I saw a dark woman with a tail stature and loud voice," but he made no mention of "from among Bani Israel".
[1976]
Jabir reported that the sun eclipsed during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on that very day when Ibrahim (the Prophet's son) died. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up and led people in (two rak'ahs of) prayer with six ruku's and four prostrations. He commenced (the prayer) with takbir (Allah-o-Akbar) and then recited and prolonged his recital. He then bowed nearly the (length of time) that he stood up. He then raised his head from the ruku' and recited but less than the first recital. He then bowed (to the length of time) that he stood up. He then raised his head from the ruku' and again recited but less than the second recital. He then bowed (to the length of time) that he stood up. He then lifted his head from the ruku'. He then fell in prostration and observed two prostrations. He stood up and then bowed, observing six ruku's like it, without (completing) the rak'ah in them, except (this difference) that the first (qiyam of ruku') was longer than the later one, and the ruku' was nearly (of the same length) as prostration. He then moved backward and the rows behind him also moved backward till we reached the extreme (Abu Bakr said: till he reached near the women) He then moved forward and the people also moved forward along with him till he stood at his (original) place (of worship). He then completed the prayer as it was required to complete and the sun brightened and he said: O people ! verily the sun and the moon are among the signs of Allah and they do not eclipse at the death of anyone among people (Abu Bakr said: On the death of any human being). So when you see anything like it (of the nature of eclipse), pray till it is bright. There is nothing which you have been promised (in the next world) but I have seen it in this prayer of mine. Hell was brought to me as you saw me moving back on account of fear lest its heat might affect me; and I saw the owner of the curved staff who dragged his intestines in the fire, and he used to steal (the belongings) of the pilgrims with his curved staff. If he (the owner of the staff) became aware, he would say: It got (accidentally) entangled in my curved staff, but if he was unaware of that, he would take that away. I also saw in it (in Hell) the owner of a cat whom she had tied and did not feed her nor set her free so that she could eat the creatures of the earth, till the cat died of starvation. Paradise was brought to me, and it was on that occasion that you saw me moving forward till I stood at my place (of worship). I stretched my hand as I wanted to catch hold of its fruits so that you may see them. Then I thought of not doing it. Nothing which you have been promised was there that I did not see in this prayer of mine.
[1977]
Asma' reported: The sun eclipsed during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). As I went to 'A'isha who was busy in prayer. I said: What is the matter with the people that they are praying (a special prayer)? She ('A'isha) pointed towards the sky with her head. I said: Is it (an unusual) sign? She said: Yes. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up for prayer for such a long time that I was about to faint. I caught hold of a waterskin lying by my side, and began to pour water over my head, or (began to sprinkle water) on my face. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then finished and the sun had brightened. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then addressed the people, (after) praising Allah and lauding Him, and then said: There was no such thing as I did not see earlier, but I saw it at this very place of mine. I ever saw Paradise and Hell. It was also revealed to me that you would be tried in the graves, as you would he tried something like the turmoil of the Dajjal. Asma' said: I do not know which word he actually used (qariban or mithl), and each one of you would be brought and it would be said: What is your knowledge about this man? If the person is a believer, (Asma' said: I do not know whether it was the word al-Mu'min or al-Mu'qin) he would say: He is Muhammad and he is the Messenger of Allah. He brought to us the clear signs and right guidance. So we responded and obeyed him. (He would repeat this three times), and it would be said to him: You should go to sleep.We already knew that you are a believer in him. So the pious man would go to sleep. So far as the hypocrite or sceptic is concerned (Asma' said: I do not know which word was that: al-Munafiq (hypocrite) or al-Murtad (doubtful) he would say: I do not know. I only uttered whatever I heard people say.
[1978]
Asma' said: I came to 'A'isha when the people were standing (in prayer) and she was also praying. I said: What is this excitement of the people for? And the rest of the hadith was narrated like one, (narrated above). 'Urwa said: Do not say Kasafat-ush-Shamsu, but say Khasafat-ush-Shamsu.
[1979]
Asma' bint Abu Bakr said: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was one day (i.e. on the day when the sun eclipsed) so perturbed that he (in haste) took hold of the outer garment (of a female member of his family) and it was later on that his (own) cloak was sent to him. He stood in prayer along with people for such a long time that if a man came he did not realise that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had observed ruku', as it has been narrated about ruku' in connection with long qiyam.
[1980]
Abu Juraij narrated this hadith with the same chain of transmitters (but with the addition of these words): "It was for a long duration that he (the Holy Prophet) observed qiyam and he would then observe ruku'. (The narrator also added) I (Asma') looked at a woman who was older than I, and at another who was weaker than I.
[1981]
Asma' daughter of Abu Bakr reported: The sun eclipsed during the lifetime of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him); so he felt perturbed and he, by mistake, took hold of the outer garment of a woman till he was given his own cloak. After this I satisfied my need and then came and entered the mosque. I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) standing in prayer. I stood along with him. He prolonged his qiyam till I wished to sit down. Then I cast a glance towards an old woman. So I said: She is older than I. I, therefore, kept standing. He (the Holy Prophet) then observed ruku', and prolonged his ruku'. He then raised his head. He then prolonged his qiyam to such an extent that if a person happened to come he would have thought that he had not observed the ruku'.
[1982]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: There was an eclipse of the sun during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). The Messenger of Allah, (may peace be upon him) prayed accompanied by the people. He stood for a long time, about as long as it would take to recite Surah al-Baqara; then he bowed for a long time; then he raised his head and stood for a long time, but it was less than the first qiyam. He then bowed for a long time but for a shorter while than the first. He then prostrated and then stood for a long time, but it was less than the first qiyam. He then bowed for a long time, but it was less than the first bowing. He then raised (his head) and stood for a long time, but it was less than the first qiyam. He then bowed for a long time but it was less than the first bowing. He then observed prostration, and then he finished, and the sun had cleared (by that time). He (the Holy Prophet) then said : The sun and moon are two signs from the signs of Allah. These two do not eclipse on account of the death of anyone or on account of the birth of anyone. So when you see that, remember Allah. They (his Companions) said: Messenger of Allah, we saw you reach out to something, while you were standing here, then we saw you restrain yourself. He said: I saw Paradise and reached out to a bunch of its grapes; and had I taken it you would have eaten of it as long as the world endured. I saw Hell also. No such (abominable) sight have I ever seen as that which I saw today; and I observed that most of its inhabitants were women. They said: Messenger of Allah, on what account is it so? He said: For their ingratitude or disbelief (bi-kufraihinna). It was said: Do they disbelieve in Allah? He said: (Not for their disbelief in God) but for their ingratitude to their husbands and ingratitude to kindness. If you were to treat one of them kindly for ever, but if she later saw anything (displeasing) in you, she would say: i have never seen any good in you.
[1983]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zaid b. Aslam with the same chain of transmitters except with this difference that he (the narrator said): " then we saw you keeping aloof (back)."
[1984]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: When there was a solar eclipse the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) observed eight ruku's and four prostrations (in two rak'ahs). This has been narrated by 'Ali also.
[1985]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed prayer while it was (solar) eclipse. He recited (the Qur'an in qiyam) and then bowed. He again recited and again bowed. He again recited and again bowed and again recited and again bowed, and then prostrated; and the second (rak'ah) was like this.
[1986]
'Amr b. al-'As reported: When the sun eclipsed during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), they (the people) were called to congregational prayers. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed two ruku's in one rak'ah. He then stood and observed two ruku's in (the second) rak'ah. The sun then became bright, and 'A'isha said; Never did I observe, ruku' and prostration longer than this (ruku' and prostration).
[1987]
Abu Mas'ud al-Ansari reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily the sun and the moon are the two signs among the signs of Allah by which He frightens his servants and they do not eclipse on account of the death of any one of the people. So when you see anything about them, observe prayer, supplicate Allah till it is cleared from you.
[1988]
Abu Mas'ud reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Verily the sun and the moon do not eclipse on account of the death of any one of the people, but they are the two signs among the signs of Allah. So when you see it, stand up and observe prayer.
[1989]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Isma'il with the same chain of transmitters and in the hadith narrated by Sufyan and Waki' (the words are): "The sun eclipsed on the day when Ibrahim died, and the people said: It has eclipsed on the death of Ibrahim."
[1990]
Abu Musa reported: The sun eclipsed during the time of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). He stood in great anxiety fearing that it might be the Doomsday, till he came to the mosque. He stood up to pray with prolonged qiyam, ruku', and prostration which I never saw him doing in prayer; and then he said: These are the signs which Allah sends, not on account of the death of anyone or life of any one, but Allah sends them to frighten thereby His servants. So when you see any such thing, hasten to remember Him, supplicate Him and beg pardon from Him, and in the narration transmitted by Ibn 'Ala the words are: "The sun eclipsed"." "He frightens His servants."
[1991]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Samura said: During the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) I was shooting my arrows in Medina, when an eclipse of the sun took place. I, therefore, threw them away and said, I must see how the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) acts in a solar eclipse today. When I came to him, he had been supplicating with his hands, raised, pronouncing Allah-o-Akbar, praising Him, acknowledging that He is One God till the eclipse was over, then he recited two surahs and prayed two rak'ahs.
[1992]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Samura, who was one of the Companions of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: During the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) I was shooting some of my arrows in Medina, when the sun eclipsed. I threw (the arrows) and said: By Allah, I must see how the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) acts in solar eclipse. So I came to him and he was standing in prayer, raising his hands, glorifying Him, praising Him, acknowledging His Oneness, declaring His greatness, and supplicating Him, till the sun cleared. When the eclipse was over, he recited two surahs and prayed two rak'ahs.
[1993]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Samura reported: I was shooting some of my arrows during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that the sun eclipsed. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[1994]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed: Verily the sun and the moon do not eclipse on account of the death or life of anyone. They are in fact the signs among the signs of Allah. So when you see them, observe prayer.
[1995]
Ziyad b. 'Ilaqa reported: I heard Mughira b. Shu'ba saying that the sun eclipsed during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the day when Ibrahim died. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Verily the sun and the moon are the two signs among the signs of Allah. They do not eclipse on account of the death of anyone or on account of the birth of anyone. So when you see them, supplicate Allah, and observe prayer till it is over.
KITAB-UL-JANA'IZ
BOOK RELATING TO THE DEAD
A Divine Service is held over the dead body of every Muslim, young or old, even of infants who have lived only for a few minutes. A Muslim opens his eyes in the world with the words of Adhan in his ears in which he is told that he is a moral being having moral and spiritual responsibilities far more important than the physical needs. He should live in the world with a firm belief in the Creator of the Universe as his only Deity. Then he should spend his life as a sincere and devoted follower of Muhammad (may peace be upon him), for it is through him that he has received full information about the Will of God and the Divine Code of life. It Is also imprinted upon his fresh and clear mind that prayer elevates the soul of man and herein lies his success in this world and the world to come. With this sacred message he is made to start his life. Both the paths are shown to him, the path of righteousness and religious piety and the path of evil and irreligiousness, and then it is left to his discretion to choose the path he likes. After spending the allotted length of time he is called back to his Master.
When the soul leaves the body, preparations are made for bidding him the last farewell. He is washed and perfumed and is wrapped in white sheets. Then the funeral prayer is observed keeping his dead body in front of the Imam in which God to requested in congregation to grant him pardon for his minor and major sins, for all his failings and to wrap him in His Mercy.
A Muslim is received in this world with Adhan and lqama and he is given a send- off with prayer and supplication to Allah for treating him kindly in his heavenly home.
There is neither Adhan nor Iqama in the funeral prayer which has very deep significance. It implies that the Adhan and lqama for the funeral prayer had been pronounced at the time of his birth. He is thus awakened to the realisation of the fact that he should spend the whole span of his life with such single-minded devotion as is found in a worshipper waiting for the commencement of prayer after the Adhan and Iqama are pronounced.
[1996]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Exhort to recite "There is no god but Allah" to those of you who are dying.
[1997]
This hadith has been narrated by Sulaiman b. Bilal with the same chain of transmitters.
[1998]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Exhort to recite "There is no god but Allah" to those of you who are dying.
[1999]
Umm Salama reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If any Muslim who suffers some calamity says, what Allah has commanded him, "We belong to Allah and to Him shall we return; O Allah, reward me for my affliction and give me something better than it in exchange for it," Allah will give him something better than it in exchange. When Abu Salama died she said: What Muslim is better than Abu Salama whose family was the first to emigrate to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). I then said the words, and Allah gave me God's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in exchange. She said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent Hatib b. Abu Balta'a to deliver me the message of marriage with him. I said to him: I have a daughter (as my dependant) and I am of jealous temperament. He (the Holy Prophet) said: So far as her daughter is concerned, we would supplicate Allah, that He may free her (of her responsibility) and I would also supplicate Allah to do away with (her) jealous (temperament).
[2000]
Umm Salama, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If any servant (of Allah) who suffers a calamity says: "We belong to Allah and to Him shall we return; O Allah, reward me for my affliction and give me something better than it in exchange for it,"' Allah will give him reward for affliction, and would give him something better than it in exchange. She (Umm Salama) said: When Abu Salama died. I uttered (these very words) as I was commanded (to do) by the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). So Allah gave me better in exchange than him. i.e. (I was taken as the wife of) the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).